CHAPTER FOUR

Critical engagement with Kant's ethics
The internal crisis that marked Hegel's period in Frankfurt manifested itselfnot just in the way his manuscripts broke off, frequently at the decisive moment, but also in the abrupt changes of theme. We have seen how the studies of Christianity and Judaism were succeeded by the article on Württemberg. This was followed, though not at once, by the fragments on the German constitution. (We have taken them together only because of their thematic similarities and to avoid needless repetition.) In fact however the pamphlet on Württemberg was followed by an extensive analysis of Kant's ethical writings. We learn from Hegel's own diary that his study of Kant began on 10 August 1798, i.e. almost as soon as he had completed the Württemberg essay. If our hypothesis is correct, the work on Kant was followed by The German Constitution and from February 1799 we may date the beginning of his preoccupation with Steuart's economics. After that Hegel resumed his study of Christianity and wrote his largest essay of the Frankfurt period, The Spirit of Christianity and its Fate.

Throughout this transitional period one has the feeling that Hegel takes up problems with great passion because they affect him as immediate, personal problems, but that again and again he is forced to acknowledge that he has neither the socio-historical knowledge, nor the philosophical equipment to solve them in a way that would satisfy his own ambitions or do justice to the problems themselves. Of course, we can see that by increasing his knowledge and deepening his grasp of philosophy Hegel was attempting to bridge an unbridgeable chasm: we have pointed to the objective situation which blocked the road to a true historical and scientific understanding ofbourgeois society. But the path he takes in search of this goal is the uninterrupted development of the dialectical method. The closer he imagines himself to be to the longed-for 'reconciliation', the more recalcitrant the contradictions in his material become, with the result that he temporarily abandons the project. But his constantly increasing knowledge of the dialectical structure of existence transforms each new stage into another step towards a definition of dialectical science. What from the personal, biographical point of view appears desultory has a definite objective continuity: it steadily leads him to an understanding of contradiction as the foundation of all thought and being.

. Hegel's preoccupation with Kantian ethics is determined above all by his new view of society. As we have seen, his starting-point was the problems and needs of the individual, the moral problems that confront the individual in his life in society. This brought him in a sense quite close to Kant's ethical doctrines which have their centre, as is well known, in the moral duties of the individual. But even at this stage Hegel's approach was quite different from Kant's and so a critical confrontation was unavoidable, whereas in Berne, where Hegel was almost entirely unconcerned about the fate of the individual, it was possible for him to take up an attitude of benevolent neutrality. The confrontation was aggravated further by the differing attitudes of the two men towards religion. Kant's ethical system culminated with the elevation of God to a 'postulate of practical reason'. (We have already seen—p. if.——how Hegel and Schelling reacted to this aspect of Kant's philosophy in Berne.) Hegel's philosophy, too, culminates in a religious position in Frankfurt, but one entirely opposed to that ofKant. However, since this was one ofthe chiefthemes ofHegel's thought at this period a confrontation with Kant had to come sooner or later.

It appears further that Kant's view of the relations between religion and the state formed one of the chief matters at issue in this first great confrontation with Kant. I say 'appears', because here too we must reflect of Hegel's development in Frankfurt that this problem would have formed an important element in his analysis of Kant, but we must not overlook the possibility that Rosenkranz gave it undue weight because the problem was dear to his own heart and that, placed in its original context, it might have been less significant than would now appear.

sadly that this manuscript is among those that have been lost. Even when Rosenkranz was working on his biography of Hegel very little remained ofthe latter's critique ofKant's doctrine ofvirtue. But he did at least possess Hegel's commentary on The Metaphysics of Morals and on Kant's doctrine oflaw in toto. Since then all the manuscripts have vanished and all we now have are the notes and quotations to be found in Rosenkranz, who confines himself chiefly to Hegel's views on the relationship between church and state.1 We can see from our previous examination


Our analysis must begin, therefore, with the fragments that appear in Rosenkranz. But we must proceed with caution, bearing these reservations in mind, all the more so since the very detailed discussiom of Kant adapted and developed them further. However, despite the risks of biographical inaccuracy we think it is best to violate the precise chronology ancl discuss the relevant passages of The Spirit of Christianity immediately after the commentary, partly to avoid repetition and partly to enable us to reach some sort of coherent conclusions about the disagreements between the two thinkers at this time.

in The Spirit of Christianity relate to very different aspects of ethical philosophy, and the question of church and state plays a much reduced role in the later manuscript. Of course, given the abrupt changes in Hegel's development at this time it is very difficult to surmise to what extent the treatment of Kant in The Spirit of Christianity and the present commentary on Kant move along the same lines, to what extent Hegel made use of the commentary for the larger work and whether he


In his introductory remarks to the Kant commentary Rosenkranz speaks of Hegel's attempts to resolve the Kantian antithesis between legality and morality in ethical life, or as Hegel still calls it, 'life'. This is undoubtedly the groundplan for the Jena System of Ethics. The disappearance of these first statements is an irreparable loss for our understanding of Hegel's development. Rosenkranz does not indicate how Hegel thought of the various gradations in morality at this time; he does not even say whether they were presented in any dialectical pattern at all. We have indeed found hints of such a pattern in the Nohl fragments and in The Spirit of Christianity it is already fairly prevalent. We may assume, therefore, that this may be said also ofthe Kant commentary, but we cannot know how clearly it was developed.

There is greater clarity about the nature of Hegel's general critique of Kantian morality. According to Rosenkranz:

'He protested against the suppression of nature in Kant and the fragmentation of man in the casuistry springing from the absolutism ofhis conception of duty. '2

This was one of the most common objections to Kant's conception of morality at the time; quite apart from Hamann and Herder who criticized the whole of classical philosophy, we find it above all in Goethe and Schiller. Goethe simply rejects the Kantian doctrine in its entirety, while Schiller attempts to overcome its problematic nature with the aid of aesthetics and the application of aesthetic principles to life. As we shall see from The Spirit of Christianity Hegel's position is broadly in line with that ofthe two poets though his concept of'life' is more elastic and comprehensive than Schiller's aesthetic ideas. The fragmentation of man resulting from the absoluteness, the metaphysical nature of Kant's principles is one of the leitmotivs of Hegel's polemics against Kant from Jena on. In Jena, for instance,,he refers to the 'soul-sack of the subject' stuffed full of 'faculties' arbitrarily separated from each other.3 and in Hegel's view the advantage of objective idealism when compared to the Kantian system consists largely in the fact that it postulates a dialectical unity in the subject, thus overcoming Kant's fragmentation ofman.

The only part of the critique of which enough is preserved to give us any real insight into Hegel's position is the section dealing with church and state. Hegel formulates Kant's view of this as follows:

'Both church and state should leave each other in peace, for neither concerns the other.'

Given the crucial importance of religion in his own thought at the time Hegel could not possibly accept this attitude. In particular, he clearly perceived the grounds for conflict: since the state is based on the principle of property, its laws must be utterly opposed to those of the church. According to Hegel the reason for this lies in their differing relations to men. The law of the state affects

'man only very imperfectly since it thinks ofhim only as one who possesses, whereas in the church man is a whole ... if a man can live at peace with both, this can only mean that either his relationship with the church or his relationship with the state is not taken senously.'

Hegel then goes on to discuss the two extremes of the Jesuits and the - Quakers, without giving his approval to either. He further rejects as 'inhuman' the domination of the church by the state; such dommation must create a fanaticism

'which because it sees individuals and human relationships in the power of the state, sees the state in men and thereby fragments men themselves'.

These arguments culminate in the utopian idea of a union between church and state that will secure the integrity of man.

'The whole church is only fragmented when man within the whole is divided into a man of the church and a man of the state.，4

In our ignorance of the precise context of this critique we must be highly circumspect in drawing any conclusions. But we can certainly see the extremities to which Hegel is driven in his quest for the unity of life and the integrity of a mankind fragmented by capitalism in religion. Even in later life Hegel never worked out a correct view of the relations between church and state, but he never again went so far as to advocate this kind of reactionary theocracy. It is possible that the arguments used here played some sort of a role in the article on The German Constitution and may be one of the factors responsible for Hegel's failure to complete it.

Philosophically, what counts is the contrast between the whole man and man fragmented. Even though his search for a religious solution complicated and distorted his arguments, the central point of his ethical studies and his opposition to Kant remains the analysis of bourgeois society based on this insight. Hegel comes more and more to regard the present as a transitory period ofcrisis, of universal contradiction and disintegration. The task of philosophy (and now of religion) is to overcome these contradictions in life itself. But the contradictions must be genuinely overcome: it is not enough just to weaken or alleviate them, papering over the rifts and divisions in the age. Hegel's thought leads him to emphasize the contradictions, to make them as explicit as possible, even to the point of apparent insolubility. Hence his objections to Kant are based on what Hegel thinks of as Kant's tendency to freeze the various moments of modern bourgeois fragmentation, to turn them into absolutes and thus to perpetuate the contradictions in a primitive, rudimentary state m which tney can no longer be superseded or transcended. As we shall see, the objective-idealist critique of Kant developed by Hegel presses increasingly in the direction of a more complete and realistic view of the moral problems of man in society.

At first glance it is something of a paradox to call Hegel 'realistic' at the very moment when he is lost in the murky depths of mysticism to a greater extent than Kant ever was, or even Fichte, Kant's successor in the field of moral philosophy. But when we take a closer look at these two conflicting trends we see not merely that our use of the word is justified, but also that Hegel provides a very decisive critique ofthe limits and prejudices contained in the radical subjective idealism of Kant and Fichte in the field of ethics, even though he does so from an objective idealism that at this stage is instinctive rather than conscious. The point at issue is the problem of 'the whole man'. In German idealism the capitalist division oflabour, particularly in its primitive, pre-revolutionary, ascetic phase, is refl.ecte J as the division of man into qualities of the mind and the senses. This division is the heritage of religion, but its implications in the initial stages ofclassical German philosophy do not stem from religion in general, but from the religious asceticism of those sects that embodied these ideological tendencies at an early stage of capitalism when its ideological and economic development was still rudimentary. We must remind ourselves ofthe role ofthe sects in the Peasant War in Germany, the War ofLiberation in the Netherlands and even in the English Revolution. And it would be a mistake to overlook the very significant elements of this tradition in Rousseau's ascetic idealism and in a number of his Jacobin disciples, such as Robespierre.

Now the sharp, antagonistic distinction between the mind and the senses with its epistemological and ethical implications makes classical German idealism the heir of this tradition. In addition the reality of the capitalist division of labour itself led to specialization, the separation of the particular human qualities and faculties from each other and the overdevelopment ofone at the cost ofcrippling the others.

In the moral theories of Kant and Fichte this division expresses their own criticism ofthe morality oftheir contemporaries while providing a philosophical instrument whereby to affirm the existing social framework. In the purely mental sphere of the 'categorical imperative' first Kant and then Fichte construct an ideal image of society in which the unconditional devotion to a spiritual and mental 'duty' which no longer belongs to the world of phenomena can function harmoniously and free of conflict. Thus all the antagonisms and contradictions in actual society are now reduced to the smgle contrast between sensuous and moral man, 'homo phenomenon' and 'homo noumenon'. And according to this doctrine, if men would only conduct their lives in accordance with the dictates of the moral law there would be no more conflict or contradiction in society. This conception of morality can only be validated philosophically by transforming all the moral problems of society into the formal postulates of 'practical reason'. Man appears to be no more than the more or less contingent actor in whom these postulates can be realized. In Fichte this kind of position is maintained even more uncompromisingly than in Kant himself. As he puts it:

'I can and may look after myself simply because, and to the degree that, I am the instrument of the moral law; but this applies to every other human being too.—But this gives us an utterly reliable test to discover whether taking care of oneself is moral, or whether it is merely an instinct.，5

These views give expression to two important social trends. First, the morality of the first, ascetic stage of bourgems development, with the radical spiritualization and the idealist projection of the moral postulates ofbourgeois society into heaven. Second, the illusion that bourgeois society, 'in its ideal state', contains no self-contradiction, and that the contradictions that actually appear arise partly from social institutions which have been imperfectly transformed into bourgeois institutions, and partly from the imperfections of man, and especially from an excessive surrender to the claims of the senses, of individual members ofsociety. In this second factor we see the pre-revolutionary narrowness of the idealist constructs of Kant and Fichte (in comparison with the French Revolution). Many revolutionaries have shared these illusions about bourgeois society, though they have not all expressed them in such extravagant, idealist language.

Hegel's opposition to the ethical doctrines of Kant and Fichte is directed at these two points. It was doubtless visible in the Rosenkranz manuscript of which now only the slightest fragments remain. But if we are to consider his views in detail, and the polemic is of the highest importance for Hegel's development and the concretization of his position, we shall have to have recourse to the relevant passages of the later Spirit of Christianity .6

In the first draft of The Spirit of Christianity and its Fate, Hegel's chief objection to the Kantian ethic is that in it man is

'always a slave against a tyrant and at the same time, a tyrant against slaves.'

In the final version he gives a fuller explanation:

'A man who wished to restore man's humanity m its entirety could not possibly have taken a course like this which does nothmg for man's divided self but to add to it an obdurate conceit. To act in the spirit of the laws could not have meant for him "to act out of respect for duty and agamst one's inclinations" . .,

Thus Hegel reproaches Kant with perpetuating that fragmentation of man which Hegel too acknowledges as a fact and hence as the startingpoint for philosophy, Kant's solution to his own opposition of duty and mclination (spirit and the senses) is not only not a solution, but even con-tams elements of inhumanity and its only effect is to add hypocnsy to the other vices oflife.

Thus Hegel sees the Kantian ethic as just another form of the philistinism that must be combated in the interest of man and of social progress.

We recall here that in the very first Frankfurt notes Hegel associated the Kantian ethic with the religious preservation of positivity (sec p. 127—8). And in his further discussion of the ideas already quoted he refers to one of Kant's writings on religion in which Kant sets out to prove the superiority of his ethical theory over the positive religions. (Kant, Die Religion innerhalb der Grenzen der blossen Vernunft, Leipzig 1903, p. 206.) Hegel contests Kant's claim here vigorously.

'By this line of argument, however, positivity is only partially removed; and between the Shaman of the Tungus and the European prelate who rules church and state, between the Mongols and the Puritans, on the one hand, and the man who listens to his own command of duty on the other, the difference is not that the former make themselves slaves, while the latter is free, but that the former have their lord outside themselves, while the latter carries his lord in himself, yet at the same time is his own slave. For the particular instincts, mclinations,. pathological love8, sensuous expenence, or whatever else it is called——the universal is necessarily and always something alien and objective. There remains a residuum of indestructible positivity which finally shocks us because the content which the universal command of duty acquires, a specific duty, contams the contradiction of being restncted and universal at the same time, and makes the most stubborn claims for its one-sidedness, i.e. on the strength of possessing universality of form. Woe to the human relations which are not unquestionably found in the concept of duty; for this concept (since it is not merely the empty thought ofuniversality but is to manifest itself

in an action) excludes or dominates all other relations.9

We see here how Hegel develops a two-pronged attack on the Kantian ethic. He rejects it primarily because it disregards the whole, - living man and instead expels man's living existence from ethics, subjugates it by means of laws alien to life and thus transforms morality into a dead 'positive' thing. And secondly he sees clearly that this rigidly mechanical aspect ofKant's thought is intimately connected with the hypostatization ot the concept of duty. This insight brings Hegel a significant step forward in the development of the dialectic. He is not primarily interested in the content ofKant's ethics, in whether particular injunctions are morally valid or not. He is concerned to refute the method by which Kant arrives at them. He asserts with increasing confidence that a moral commandment which arises in certain social and historical circum

stances, in which alone it is valid, can become false when it is maintained under different circumstances. This not only brings him much closer to the dialectical conception of the relation between true and false, one of the key epistemological themes ofJena, but it leads directly to the heart ofHegel's later approach to ethics.

The different methodological approaches of the two thinkers may be briefly summarized as follows: Kant leaves the social contents of ethics uninvestigated, he takes them as they are given without any historical critique, and attempts to deduce moral laws from the internal coherence of the content of the imperative. For Hegel, on the other hand, every single moral imperative is just a part, a moment, of a living social whole which is in constant flux. For Kant the individual moral laws stand in

isolation from each other, each the allegedly inexorable inference from a unified supra-historical and supra-social 'principle of reason'; for Hegel they are all moments of a dialectical process in the course of which they come into collision with each other and, through their own momentum and lively interaction, cancel each other out, wither away in the course of time, or else re-emerge in a different form and with a different content.

The contrast between the two thinkers is not so well defined in socio-historical terms at this stage as it was to become a few years later inJena, but at the level ofmethod it is clear enough. And it is also easy to see that Hegel's objections to Kant are based on his different view of civil society. We have already described Hegel's search for a 'reconciliation' with civil society and with the people who live in it, just as they really are. For this reason he rebels against the violation of living human beings by abstract moral injunctions, and the dehumanizing division of man into mental and sensuous halves.

Thus Hegel's critique ofKant is evidently pointing in the same direction as that ofGoethe and Schiller. Goethe majestically ignores the methodological problems of idealist ethics and arrives at a humanist position as poet and thinker by a spontaneous materialist route. Schiller for his part rejects the harsh consequences of Kant's doctrine but remains in sympathy with his basic philosophy and refuses to go beyond the limits ofKantian epistemology. Hegel's early method is consciously to elaborate all the contradictions that emerge from Kant's ethical philosophy and with their aid arrive at a definition of what the whole of life, 'religious life', civil society, really demands ofman.

We recall our earlier discussion (p. 127) of positivity in which we said that for Hegel at this time everything positive represented a false synthesis. Hegel's conception of positivity naturally implies that the only way to eliminate the positive is through human activity. As long as action was thought of in socially abstract terms, as in Berne, the question was very simple: republican activity in antiquity was free of positivity, the private individuals of the Christian era in their passivity know only the positive. Now, when he has to consider the nature of action on the part of individuals' in civil society, another criterion becomes necessary. Acuon and non-action, activity and passivity are no longer so rigidly opposed to each other as in Berne. One implication of this is that not every action annuls positivity. It does so only if it produces the correct 'union'.

'The moral element of action lies in choice and choice is moral when the union achieved is one where that which is excluded is divisive; where the idea that is unified in the action with the thinking subject of the action, is itselfalready unified——and it is immoral if it is divisive. '10

These remarks, too, bear the stamp of the oracular abstraction characteristic of so much of the Frankfurt period. Hegel's starting-point here is Kant's conception of freedom, of the possibility of a free choice between good and evil. The later dialectics of freedom and necessity are scarcely in evidence. In his polemical interpretation he again defmes choice as a union: a union of the subject that makes the choice and the object of that choice. Confusing though the word 'union' may be in this context the nature of Hegel's hostility to the Kantian ethical doctrine does emerge very clearly. For Kant the fact of freedom (of the moral outlook expressed in it) suffices to make an action moral. If the motives resulting in an action conform to the dictates of practical reason then, according to Kant, the social content of the action must inevitably be moral too. Hence the social content follows directly, logically from the formal postulates of freedom, from the victory of homo noumenon over homo phenomenon.

This direct formal and logical necessity is contested by Hegel. In his obscure terminology he seems to be saying: a union can be either real or apparent (i.e. only in the mind, only positive). The choice for its part

CRITICAL ENGAGEMENT WITH KANT’S ETHICS I55 also achieves a union between the subject that chooses and the object chosen. Whether the action which satisfies these formal requirements is really moral depends according to Hegel on the content of the object. If this is a real union then the action is moral; if union is only apparent, positive, then the action is immoral. And this is so whether or not Kant's formal criteria have been satisfied, independently of the state of mind of the subject making his choice.

In blunt contrast to Kant's approach Hegel's criterion is neither formal nor is it a moment of the individual's consciousness (conscience, etc. )—it relates to content, a content bound up with life in civil society. His general use ofthe word 'life' can no longer disguise this fact. For example,

'Morality is what is fitting, it is union with the law ofli —if the law is not the law of life, but something alien, then we have the greatest cleavage, objectivity. '10

In the Kantian ethic it is entirely a matter ofchance whether there is a union with 'the law oflife' and hence it can provide no guarantee that the dead positivity of the world can be overcome by it. Indeed, in Hegel's view, the form of the Kantian injunction to do one's duty with its division of man into two hostile parts, reason and the senses, necessarily precludes the union, the real synthesis of man with the 'law oflife', the 'reconciliation' of man with civil society. In Hegel's eyes Kantian 'morality' means dependence on oneself, 'cleavage within oneself. For this reason positivity simply cannot be annulled in it and through it.

'A moral outlook can annul only the objective (moral) law and not the objective world; man stands isolatedand so does the world.'11

Hegel's attack on Kant's theory as a doctrine which preserves positivity leads to the other decisive disagreement between their positions: the problem of conflicting duties. It is on this issue that we can see most clearly the development that took place at the time in ideas about the nature of society in an age when the important thinkers and writers were attempting to grapple with the problems of the post-revolutionary world. Given the idealist character of classical German philosophy it was inevitable that the moral problems of life were not deduced from the economic structure of society, but that on the contrary the foundation and starting-point of thought was the reflection of social development in the moral attitudes and the deeds of men. Only after that do they begin to consider society which they conceive as the material and the background for these attitudes and actions. Despite this idealist inversion and distortion ofthe real state ofaffairs the methodology ofthe different moral philosophers clearly reflects their differing views of society.

The problem of conflicting duties is one of the most revealing m this context, the mere assumption that the real demands of morality can come into conflict with each other tacitly acknowledges that civil society contains contradictions. The way in which these contradictions are grasped and philosophically resolved gives us an idea of the way the various idealist philosophers think of the real problems and solutions. Since the idea that there are no contradictions in civil society (apart from the 'eternal' contradiction between phenomenal and noumenal man) is an essential part of the pre-revolutionary illusions about the life history of modern civil society, it is only natural that Kant should resolutely deny the possibility of a conflict of duties. On this point he says:

'A conflict of duties would be a relation of duties in which one of them would annul the other (wholly or in part). But a conflict of duties and obligations is inconceivable. For the concepts ofduty and obligation as such express the objective practical necessity of certain actions, and two conflicting rules cannot both be necessary at the same time: if it is our duty to act according to one of these rules, then to act according to the opposite one is not our duty and is even contrary to duty. '12

Fichte's attitude is precisely similar to this. He is a little more concrete than Kant and speaks not just of conflicts of duties in general, but of conflicts between obligations people have towards themselves and to others. But it is clear that he really provides a restatement of the same position and he naturally arrives at the same conclusion as Kant:

'There is no conflict between the freedom of rational beings in general: i.e. there is no contradiction in the fact that there are many free beings in the phenomenal world . . . A conflict, not in freedom itself but between specific free actions on the part of rational beings can only arise if a person makes an illegitimate and immoral use ofhis freedom to suppress the freedom ofanother . . .n3

We have discussed the positions of Kant and Fichte in some detail in order to make clear the extent of Hegel's break with tradition, with the view of morality and society which had obtained hitherto among the classical German philosophers. Of course, Hegel was anticipated here to some extent by Goethe and Schiller. And not merely in their purely literary works whose achievement is, in part, their ability to construct compelling images of conflict in society, which translated into the idiom ofmoral philosophy yields just those conflicts of duties of which we have spoken, but also in their theoretical writings. Schiller especially 'in his aesthetic writings and in particular his theory of tragedy placed this issue in the foreground. But since Schiller was never able to liberate himself from his Kantian assumptions there is a constant conflict between the living, authentic, poetically inspired description ofparticular social and historical antagonism and the strait-jacket of the Kantian principles in which they are confined.14

Hegel's critique ofKant increasingly places contradiction in the centre of attention, not so much concrete conflicts between concrete moral imperatives——which was the chief interest of Goethe and Schiller——but the contradictions that necessarily arise from Kant's own definition of duty. We recall that Hegel denied that Kant's ethics could achieve the annulment of positivity. He now charactenzes the philosophical quintessence oflife in positivity in this way:

'It is true that "positive man", in respect of a specific virtue which in him and for him is service, is neither moral nor immoral, and the service whereby he fulfils certain duties is not of necessity a non-virtuous attitude to these same duties; but from another aspect there is linked with this neutrality of character a measure of immorality, because the agent's specific positive service has a limit which he cannot transcend, and hence beyond it he is immoral. Thus this immorality ofpositivity does not open on the same aspect ofhuman relations as positive obedience does; within the sphere of the latter the non-moral is not the immoral. Thus the opposite of virtue is not only immorality but also non-morality. %

In a marginal note on this passage Hegel makes the comment, applicable to every moral theory of the Kantian type, that it contains 'neither change, nor gain, nor birth, nor death'. Whereas virtue, as Hegel understands it, is a 'modification of life', it may exist or not exist, it 'can be born and can die'. Hegel goes on to make a contrast between the speculative moralist of the Kantian type who 'can only make war on life' and the pedagogue and reformer 'who addresses himself to human beings* and for whom the problems ofbirth and death are of decisive importance.

We here see the great importance of the argument that virtue has a two-fold antonym: immorality and positivity. Kant narrowed the field of ethics down to the question of whether duties were fulfilled or neglected. His lack of interest in the possibility of a conflict between the contents of the various duties was matched only by his indifference to the causes or effects in human or social terms of the fulfilment or nonfulfilment of one's moral obligations. This follows inexorably from his fundamental conception of morality and its reduction to a struggle between what is morally reasonable in man and what is merely sensual. Hegel does away with this conflict altogether and searches for the real moral conflicts in the realities of society. We have already seen (p. 209) that his criterion for the rightness of a moral action lies in the content of the ,union* that has been chosen. He now becomes more specific and defines two different kinds of false union: mere positivity, i.e. imprisonment within the immediate, lifeless manifestations of society, and immorality, the direct rebellion against the real, dominant 'unions' in a given society.

Thus Hegel not only regards all those areas utterly neglected by Kant as the very core of ethical thought, but he goes further than this: he is concerned to define the specific, contradictory, human and social meaning of all these very mvolved and disparate conflicts. At the end of the marginal note referred to above he says:

'the destruction of vice lies in the way that it brings about the punishment of the wrong-doer. Punishment is the necessary evil consequence of crime,'but not every consequence of crime can be called pumshment, e.g. a man's character may deteriorate in the course of crime——it cannot be said that the crimmal deserved to become even worse.*16

Hegel proceeds from these premises to a ruthless critique of Kant's denial that moral imperatives conflict. He shows that such conflicts must necessarily arise from wealth and the complexity oflife. And it is important to note that even in Frankfurt Hegel saw this problem historically. As life becomes increasingly varied and complex (in an emergent bourgeois society) the contradictions lying at the roots of moral conflict increase. By way of illustration we shall cite a lengthy passage dealing with this question, though we must draw the reader's attention to Hegel's annulment of the entire realm of morality by love and religion: in contrast to the contradictions in the sphere of morality, love and religion appear as the principle of a unified life. We must postpone a discussion of the conscious and unconscious contradictions in his view of love and religion until we make a full-scale analysis of the central arguments in The Spirit of Christianity. Of the dialectical contradictions inherent in every moral system Hegel writes as follows:

'But love reconciles not only the trespasser with his fate but also man with virtue, i.e. if love were not the sole principle of virtue, then every virtue would be at the same time a vice. To complete subjection under the law of an alien Lord, Jesus opposed not a partial subjection under a law of one's own, the self-coercion ofKantian virtue, but virtues without lordship and without submission, i.e. virtues as modifications of love. If the virtues had to be regarded otherwise than as modifications of one living spirit, if every virtue were an absolute virtue, the result would be insoluble conflicts arising from the plurality of absolutes. If there is no such thing as unification in one spirit, every virtue has something defective about it, since each is by its very name a single and so a restricted virtue. The circumstances in which it is possible——the objects, the conditions of an action——are something accidental; besides, the relation ofthe virtue to its object is a single one; it precludes other relations to that object as well as relations of the same virtue to other objects. Hence every virtue, alike in its concept and in its activity, has its limit which it cannot overstep. A man of this specific virtue who acts beyond the limit of his virtue can act only viciously, . . A right given up for the one relation can no longer be a right for the other, or, if it is saved up for the other, the ffmt must starve. In proportion as the multiplicity of human relationships grows, the mass of virtues also increases, and so does the mass of inevitable conflicts and the impossibility of fulfilment. If the man of many virtues tries to make a hierarchy of his creditors, all of whom he cannot satisfy, he declares himself as less indebted to those he subordinates than to the others which he calls higher. Virtues therefore may cease to be absolutely obligatory and thus may even become vices.

'In this many-sidedness ofhuman relations and this multiplicity of virtues, nothing remains save despair of virtue and trespass of virtue

itself. Only when no virtue claims to subsist firmly and absolutely in


its restricted form ... only when it is simply the one living spirit which acts and restricts itself in accordance with the whole of the given situation, in complete absence of external restriction, and without at the same time being divided by the manifold character of the situation; then and then only does the many-sidedness of the situation remain, though the mass of absolute and incompatible virtues vanishes. Here there can be no question of maintaining that underlying all the virtues there is one and the same basic principle which, always the same in different circumstances, appears differently modified as a

particular virtue. . .； When they subsist together thus absolutely, the virtues simply destroy one another. Their unity on the strength of the rule is only apparent for the rule is only a thought, and such a unity neither „nnilL multiplicity nor unifies it; it only lets it subsist in its whole strength.


'A living bond of the virtues, a living unity, is quite different from the unity of the concept; it does not set up a determinate virtue for determinate circumstances, but appears, even in the most variegated mixture of relations, untorn and unitary. Its external shape may be modified in infinite ways; it will never have the same shape twice. Its expression will never be able to afford a rule, since it never has the force of a umversal opposed to a particular' P

This passage clearly states the grounds of Hegel's disagreement with the ethical theory ofKant and Fichte. We can see the centrality and the far-reaching implications ofhis rejection oftheir approach to the conflict of moral imperatives, and we can also see why their formalism should provoke this frontal attack. However, Hegel is only deceiving himself when, in line with his general tendency in Frankfurt, he explains his position by arguing that the unity of the pnnciple ofmorality in Kant is only an idea, something merely thought, whereas in his own case that umty exists in being, in life itsel£ For die most concrete reality that he himself can give this 'life', that of'objective spirit', is itselfonly an idea. This selfdelusion reveals the insuperable barrier ofHegel's idealism quite plainly, particularly in Frankfurt where It is tinged with religiosity.

But we must beware of exaggerating the importance of this illusion, for even m Frankfurt, to say nothing of later on, his notion of 'objective spirit' is an incomparably richer, more dialectical, more realistic reflection of objective reality than the Kantian position. Its potential is already evident in Frankfurt, in the contrast between Kant's narrow formalism, his crabbed appeal to the conscience and the sense of duty of the isolated individual, and Hegel's appeal to the moral standards inherent in the totality of the effective, living determinations of society, and by implication to the realities of society as the criterion of vice and virtue.

This concentration on the content of morality, these efforts to draw attention to the problematic nature of social content, indicates a very great step forward in the development of Hegel's dialectic. It has a number of important consequences. Above all, society, with all its concrete reality, is made the direct ,conscious object of morality.,It.isself-evident'that Kantian morality presupposes bourgeois society, no less than Hegel's; both are reflections of the same society. But Kant wntes as if from a commanding position far above society. In this sense Kant's standpoint is that of the pre-revolutionary Enlightenment which unconsciously and immediately equated the as yet non-existent bourgeois society with the 'kingdom of reason'. Of course, the situation was different for the French and English Enlightenment, since they found themselves in the midst of the real struggles ofthe emergent bourgeoisie and so, notwithstanding their equally abstract, idealist and unhistoncal beliefs about society, they were able to draw much more concrete conclusions; when it came to action they were able to look at society realistically and not just from the assumptions of their own moral philosophy. Because of the backwardness of German society the idealist method of the Enlightenment culminated there in the particular idealism of Kant and Fichte. Now when this idealism proclaimed its own eternal and absolute validity from the depths ofits own subjectivist isolation, it cut itself off from the very social contents that in reality constituted the substratum of its a priori constructs. It was essential for it to re-establish contact with these social contents, but from the given position, on its own assumptions, it could only do so by sleight of hand. Hegel's critique points unerringly to the weak point in Kant's methodology here; in Jena he will go further and demonstrate Kant's failure with reference to quite specific social problems.

The problem of conflict between moral duties has a further pomt of interest: the idea that social content supplies the criterion for all moral imperatives. For Hegel this social content amounts to the totality of the social determinations in any given period of history, whereas in Kant's eyes the social concretization and fulfilment of a moral obligation could only mean conferring the support of morality upon a particular institution of bourgeois society. The fact is that Kant dogmatically assumes, firstly, that the particular institutions, moral injunctions, etc. of bourgeois society are in harmony with the postulates of reason and, secondly, that they cannot conflict with each other. Hegel rejects both of these dogmas and this leads him directly to a more dialectical grasp of hour-gems society. In the fragments under discussion we fmd ourselves at the very beginning of his development. The climax later on comes with the idea that reason, the spirit, can only realize itself in the course of the entire histoncal development of mankind and that only the whole of this process and Its end-result will satisfy the postulates of reason——a conclusion which reveals the bourgeois limitations ofHegel's ideas as clearly as did Kant's dogmatic assumptions. The particular aspects and moments of the process cannot be measured by the requirements of the absolute postulates of reason. They can only be understood and evaluated m the concrete context of the other Isolated factors together with which they form a particular historical totality. And every such historical totality (e.g. a nation at a particular stage of its development) can only be thought of as a relatively complete totality, for it is at the same time no more than a moment in the history of the spirit. This gives rise to a complicated dialectic of the relative and the absolute. Hegel was never an historical relativist. He never placed the different periods of history on a level with each other. His dissolution ofthe dogmatic absolutism ofKant is based on an idea of historical development in which each moment of history is absolute, in the sense that it represents a necessary moment in the process, but at the same time, and inseparably from this, it is only relative, smce it is only a moment in history.

Of course, the idea ofhistorical development was by no means utterly foreign to Kant. His idea of it was the infinite progress ofhumanity in its advance towards the fulfilment of the dictates of reason. But this view is defective in two respects. On the one hand, it is not able to give a satisfactory account of the different stages of the historical process. On the other hand, it leads to an all-too-simplified view of history based on the battle between reason and unreason, of reason and the senses. Hegel's more dialectical approach overcomes both these limitations. The different stages of history gain a concrete life of their own, the more so as Hegel's thought matures; he constantly labours to analyse the concrete social connections within their real historical context. We have already seen how he broadened his scheme of history by adding the Orient Qudaism) to his earlier contrast between ancient and modern. This almi.e suffices to overcome Kant's linear historical scheme.

The more Hegel works at this philosophy of history the more clearly his central beliefemerges that history ts the journey of the spirit along the road to itself, to complete self-knowledge. But the path to this goal cannot be reduced to such unambiguous moral principles as in the case of Kant. On the one hand, a more advanced stage ofhistory does not necessarily stand higher morally and culturally than the epoch it succeeds. On the contrary, in his fully developed philosophy of history Hegel will show how morally inferior, more selfish passions have provided the stimuli to an objectively higher development. On the other hand, the conquest of a higher stage in historical development always entails irreparable losses for mankind. When we come to analyse his view of history in Jena we shall see the change in his assessment of Greek civilization, a change which, however, only affects the position assigned to Greece in his overall scheme: in Berne he had regarded the city-state of antiquity as a model for the present, whereas in Jena he sees that classtcal civilization is lost beyond recall. But this change is not accompanied by a comparable change in his view of the value of classical culture. Then as now he believed that in certain spheres of human activity——above all in art—lassical civilization represented the pinnacle of human achievement. And since this climactic point ts necessarily connected with the character of classical civilization, no less necessary than that the higher development of man should advance beyond classical civilization, it becomes apparent that the entire process is a much more complex, contradictory and uneven one in which the higher development ofmankind leaves behind it pmnacles which will never again be conquered.

We have argued that the problem of a conflict of duties is one of the starting-points for the development of Hegel's dialectical method. However, it is only in the context of the later, fully-developed philosophy ofhistory that this question really gains in substance. In Frankfurt Hegel only grasped isolated moments of the overall dialectical picture and he worked out the premises and effects of these as well as he could, but the complete picture was still a long way off For all that, he did not tackle the problem in any narrow spirit; on the contrary, the social breadth and depth of his approach distinguishes him very sharply right from the start from the other contemporary thinkers who objected to the dogmatic narrowness of the categorical imperative. It is a distinction of this kind that forces us to note the senselessness and the lack of scientific rigpur which enables the imperialist neo-Hegelians to lump Hegel's Frankfurt period together with vitalist tendencies of the day. E.g. it is true enough that FriedrichJacobi, one ofthe genuine vitalists of the time, likewise criticized the inflexibility and narrowness of the categorical imperative. But he opposed to it the richness ofthe human emotional ex-

perience, the emotional world ofthe individual. He goes on in a highly rhetorical vein to defend certain 'heroic' sins against the categorical


imperative but this only leads him straight into the arms of moral relativism. The fact that 'life', Hegel's central category in Frankfurt, has very little in common with views of this sort, but in reality paves the way for

the as yet vague idea of the contradictory, living unity of bourgeois


society, of mora


^just helps


to illustrate the complexity of the problem of a conflict

Hegel's analysis here moves essentially on a fairly abstract philosophical plane, but two motifs of methodological interest do emerge.

(1) The conflict between moral imperatives springs from the dialectics of the absolute and relative. According to Hegel each moral duty is only a moment in the overall dialectical totality of society, or 'life'. But the entire complex is itself contradictory; contradictions between its particular determinations lie at its very foundations. The situation is not that the particular moral duties are all neatly compartmentalized and govern a neatly segregated area, or that they are arranged in a hierarchy, but that conflict, struggle and contradiction dominate the entire scene. Since every moment, every duty lays claim to absolute validity it must necessarily come into conflict with other moments that make the same claim. And only the living totality of all these determmations can annul this conflict. But the essence of this totality is precisely that it is a totality of such conflicting determinations.

(2) In Hegel's view each moment must necessarily lay claim to absolute validity. This brings us to a pomt where the profundity of Hegel's analysis of civil society and of the dialectical method become apparent. At the same time we perceive the limits of the idealist approach. The claim of the particular moment to absolute validity forms the focal point of Hegel's later appreciative criuque of the so-called philosophy of reflection and of the position of the determinations of reflection (Riflexionsbestimmungen) in the dialectical method. Hegel regards the determinations of reflection as an essential part of dialectics, but also as a mere stage in the understanding of reality. This separates him from Kant and Fichte who make the determmations of reflection into absolutes, fail to advance beyond them and hence fmd themselves unable to progress beyond those insoluble antinomies which follow from the determinations of reflection when these are taken to their logical conclusion. But by the same token a no less firm barrier is erected agamst vitalism, the philosophy of Romanticism, etc, which also combats the inflexibility and narrowness of the determmations of reflection, while imagming that reality can be understood without them, that they can be dismissed as inferior, merely rational forms of thought; in consequence, such views inevitably end in mystical irrationalism.

However opposed they are to each other both camps believe that the

contradictions which they encounter, are merely subjective, things which have their origin in the limitations of the human mind rather than in the nature of reality. They differ from each other only in that Kant draws agnostic conclusions from them, while Romanticism prefers irra


tional and mystical solutions. Hegel, in contrast to both regards the contradictions as something objective, which reveals the nature of reality. Hence for him the determinations of reflection are just a stage on the


road to the dialectical understanding of reality. Going beyond the antinomies of reflective understanding annuls their contradictions only to


arrive at higher, more developed contradictions of a richer stage, the stage of speculative reason. Hegel's description of the reflective understanding, ofthe hypostatization of moments w1th only a relative, "partial


validation, appears as a necessary moment of the dialectical method


itself. It is in this sense that Hegel later presents Kant and Fichte in his his


tory of philosophy dialectical method.


as the historically necessary forerunners of his


own


Hegel's attitude to the philosophy of reflection is important not only for the development ofhis own dialectics, but also histoncally. Romanticism, which according to its modern apologists can lay claim to a much more authentic historicity, is in fact utterly unhistorical on this issue: it regards the metaphysical thought of the seventeenth and eighteenth centuries, whose ultimate consequences and limitations become manifest in the thought ofKant, as a great aberration of the human mind. Hegel, by contrast, sees them from an authentically historical pomt of view and concludes that dialectics could only be reached via this route. At the same time he senses that the supremacy of metaphysical thought among his predecessors was necessarily connected with the entire cultural development of mankind, that it was an inevitable product of this particular stage ofhuman development. Later on and in the context of a discussion of the development of the natural sciences, Engels provided comprehensive materialist proof that the historical stage of metaphysical thought was indeed indispensable.

Thus from the point of view of the Hegelian system as a whole the necessity of a conflict of moral imperatives is a significant special case of the importance of the determinations of reflection in philosophy, of the necessary emergence of dialectical contradictions from the elevation of the relative determinants into absolute ones so characteristic of the ethi-


cal theory of Kant and Fichte. But just from what we have shown it is evident that, however philosophical his formulation may be, we are dealing here with one of those issues that spring directly from his own experience. That is to say, Hegel is not primarily interested in the Kantian ethic because Kant thought it out; he does not see it just as a false picture of reality. Of course, he does criticize what he regards as errors, ideas that have not been followed through to their final conclusion, and Kant's


denial that conflicts between moral imperatives can occur is just such a case. Hegel refutes this belief by showing it to be incompatible with the ultimate principles ofKantianism (and Fichteanism) itself. At this point, however, his own position changes. He regards the conflict of duties as a socio-historical reality with which thought has to come to terms and which it must use as a jumping-off pomt. Thus Hegel looks at and cnti-cizes the antmomic character ofKantianism from a double point of view: firstly, as a prodigious achievement m discovering the necessity of antinomies and treating it as a matter of philosophical importance; and secondly, as a subjectivist limit to Kant's thought (because he wishes to call a halt at the antinomies, regarding them as final).

The insight that antinomies were a necessary part of society was a significant step forward in understanding the nature of bourgeois society. We have already shown why this discovery had to be made firstly and predominantly in the realm of moral thought. His growing awareness of the nature ofbourgeois society will increasingly lead Hegel to extend his insights into the realms ofeconomic and social activity.

Of course, even then Hegel does not call a halt once he has discovered contradictions m the conflict of duties. To do so would lead to a so-called 'tragic view oflife', to a comprehensive pessimism with regard to bourgeois society. His thought drives him on inexorably m search of a resolution of all the contradictions, and we have already seen that this resolution lies in an understanding ofthe totality in movement.

We now see how the idealist limits to his thought merge with the bourgeois limits of his mental horizon. Hegel is increasingly concerned to interpret this totality in which the contradictions in the conflict of moral imperatives (i.e. in very general terms: the contradictions of the lives ofindividuals in bourgeois society) are resolved, as itselfsomething contradictory, as something driven forward by contradictions. Thanks to these efforts he arrives, at the end ofthe Frankfurt period, at a new and more comprehensive formula for dialectical contradiction than all his

predecessors; he will arrive in fact at the most comprehensive statement


available to idealist dialectics. But in order to follow this theory through to the end Hegel would have to go beyond bourgeois society, i.e. he


would have to have at least a premonition of how bourgeois society might elevate its contradictions to a higher level. But like the English classical economists, Hegel regards bourgeois society as the latest, the most highly developed and fnal form of historical development. This different manner from the earlier stages which led either historically or logically or 'phenomenologically' to this 'highest standpomt'. Hegel finds himself forced, therefore, to annul his own concept of dialectics at the very peak ofhis own system in order to be able to extinguish all the contradictions and arrive at a harmonious unity. Of course, there is nothing simple about this conclusion, it is the product of a violent internal struggle between two different tendencies in his thought. But an inevitable consequence of the social limitations imposed on him is that he is never able completely to overcome the old type of theory of contradiction. (We shall discuss other limitations of his dialectics in due course.)

means that ifthe contradictions are to be annulled this must be done in a


Thus the disagreement between Kant and Hegel goes far beyond the confines of a methodology of moral philosophy. It is a significant stage in the growth of dialectical method, even though the transformation that takes place in his thought is relatively slight and abstract for the time being. Over and above that it signals a new stage in the theory of bourgeois society. In the period leading up to the French Revolution German philosophy and literature were worthy contemporaries of prerevolutionary French ideology and now we fmd them attempting to perform the same sort of task in post-revolutionary Europe, the age of developing capitalist society. Since this latter enterprise took place on German soil where a bourgeois revolution neither did nor could have taken place, the development ofGerman thought was inevitably provincial and distorted. Marx and Engels have shown this convincingly and comprehensively not only with regard to Hegel's thought but also with reference to Goethe's poetry and above all to that of Schiller. We have shown the common social tendencies underlying the works of Hegel and those of the Weimar classics, insofar as this was possible within the framework of this study. We have also shown that m comparison with his great contemporaries, Hegel displayed a far greater energy both in his analysis of the contradictory character of bourgeois society and m his study of its 'anatomy', viz. political economy. Our further discussions must attempt to show even more clearly that these two features of Hegel's thought are mtimately connected with each other.

NOTES

1  Rosenkranz, p. 8?£

2  Ibid., p. 87.

3  Erste Druckschriften, p. 211.

4  Rosenkranz, p. 87f.

5  Fichte, Das System der Sittenlehre (1798), § 23, Leipzig 1908, Vol. II,

p. 675.                                                  ,

6  Hegel takes issue explicitly here only with Kant's ethical doctrine.

We cannot state with any certainty whether he had read Fichte's writings on morality, which had only just appeared. But since s later detailed writings on ethics and philosophy in Jena always discuss Fichte's ethics along with those of Kant, and since he regarded Fichte as the consistent follower of Kant and the heir to his errors, it seems legitimate to assume that the Frankfurt critique ofKantian ethics can be taken to refer also to Fichte.

7  Ibid., p. 266. Knox, pp. 2I2—I 3.

8  The phrase 'pathological love' occurs in Kant's discussion of what it means to love God. He calls that love pathological which is a 'love of God, considered as an inclination' and declares that it is impossible 'for He is not an object of the senses'. Critique of Practical Reason, Bk I, chap. 3, trans. T. K. Abbott, London I967, p. I 76.——Trans.

9  Nohl, p. 265f. Knox, pp. 2II—I2.

io Ibid., p. 387.

I I Ibid., p. 390.

I2 Kant, The Metaphysics of Morals, trans. M. J. Gregor, New York I964, p. 23.

I 3 Fichte, op. cit., p. 694.

14 Cf. my essays on Schiller's aesthetics in my books Goethe and his Age, London I968 and Beiträge zur Geschichte derAsthetik, Berlin.

I) Nohl, p. 276. Knox, p. 224. The last sentence deviates from Knox because G.L. quotes from a divergent text.

16  Ibid., p. 276.

17  Nohl, pp. 293ff. Knox, pp. 244-6.

The first studies in economics
Here, at the decisive point in Hegel's intellectual biography, where we might have hoped to clarify the concrete relations between his dialectics ana his study of economics we find ourselves baulked by the utter failure of our sources and we are compelled to rely almost entirely on hypotheses. We may think ourselves fortunate that Rosenkranz has at least preserved the bare fact of the date when Hegel first took up economics. All the material that Rosenkranz possessed in toto has since been lost.

It is certainly no accident that this section of Hegel's papers has vanished without trace. Of.his immediate pupils there was not a single one who had even the slightest comprehension of economic problems, let alone of their importance in the evolution of Hegel's system and methodology. They did not even notice the obvious evidence of such studies in the published works (the Phenomenology, Philosophy ofRight, etc.).

The.backwardness of German society was such that even in the case of Germany's greatest philosophical genius, Hegel himself, the intellectual reflection of social antagonisms appears in an inverted, idealistic form. In the case ofhis pupils, whose formative years fell, for the most part, in the period of the Restoration, there is an utter failure to comprehend the problems of economics and their significance for an understanding of the problems of society. And this blind spot is as much in evidence on the reactionary right-wing of the Hegelians as in the liberal centre and on the left. The timidity with which the Liberals of the I 8 30s tackled the great social issues of the time is reflected also in their utter blankness in the face of economic problems. Not until the early I 840s did the intensification of the class struggle awaken a certam interest in economic issues m the ranks of the Hegelians, and even then we find a lack ofknowledge and serious study that compares very unfavourably with Hegel. The 'philosophical arrangement' ofthe economic categories of both the classics and the utopians at the hands of the Hegelians among the 'True Socialists' and also by Lassalle scarcely advanced beyond a superfioal formalism.

Not until the early works of the founders of dialectical materialism, of Marx and Engels, do we discover not merely a profound and thorough-gomg investigation of the problems of political economy, but a

lso the conscious realization that this was the realm in which the great problems of dialectics were to be studied, that here was the great task of

taking the material accumulated, but not worked out dialectically, by the classics of bourgeois political economy and by the utopians, of discovering its underlying laws and principles, and advancing from there to an analysis of the dialectical laws of movement in society. As early as Engels' brilliant writings in the Deutsch-Jranzosiche ]ahrbUt:her, the connection between economics and dialectics-stands clearly in the foreground. Shortly after that Marx himself devotes his full attention to the problem in the Economic and Philosophic Manuscripts, the last section of which contains his critique of Hegel s The Phenomenology of Mind. In this Marx, notwithstanding nis incisive and crucial criticism ofHegel's idealism, uncovers the important and positive role of economics in the formation of the Hegelian dialectic, in particular his use of the category of labour in whicn he follows in the footsteps of the English classics. This work is then succeeded by a series of important polemical writings against Bruno Bauer, Max Stirner, Proudhon, etc, which contain a large number ofprofound and illuminating observations on these issues.

It is typical of the opportunism of the Second International that a large proportion of these writings gathered dust in the archives, their value recognized by no-one. The development of opportunism coincided with the disappearance of any understanding of dialectics and the rampant growth of metaphysical shallowness then created an atmosphere in which it was easy to twist and distort the clearly formulated propositions ofMarxist economics.

Only the Bolsheviks consistently fought against this opportunism on all fronts. Lenin, despite the disadvantage of not having access to a large part of Marx's work on this topic, was the only one to have grasped their full importance.

'It is impossible completely to understand Marx's Capital, and especially its first chapter, without having thoroughly studied and understood the whole of Hegel's Logic. Consequently, half a century later none of the Marxists understood Marx! '1

Rosenkranz, a moderate liberal and an adherent of the so-called Hegelian centre at the time of the break-up of the school, naturally had no idea of the importance of Hegel's economic studies. To give the reader an idea of the thoroughness with which the documents have been mislaid we propose to quote everything that Rosenkranz has to say on the topic in his biography; later biographers have merely copied from Rosenkranz. The discovery of Hegel's manuscripts in recent decades has greatly increased our knowledge of Hegel's study of economics in Jena, but about the years in Frankfurt we are as much in the dark as ever.

Rosenkranz states that Hegel's interest in economic questions began in Frankfurt, and that it was primarily conditions in England that excited his curiosity. He regularly read the newspapers and made detailed notes from them (which have of course been lost). In Rosenkranz's words:

'At the same time he moved closer to the immediate arena of political events and found his interest in it greatly increased. Above all he was fascinated by the relations of commerce and property especially in England, partly no doubt in accordance with the general admiration which the previous century felt for the English constitution which was regarded by many as an ideal, and partly perhaps because no other country of Europe could boast such a variety of the forms of commerce and property as England, and nowhere else was there such a great variety of personal relationships as a result. As his excerpts from English newspapers show, Hegel followed with great excitement the parliamentary debates on the Poor Law, the alms by means of which the nobility and the aristocracy of wealth attempted to appease the rage of indigent masses. '2

This passage is followed by a much more detailed account of Hegel's interest in the Prussian prison system.

Unfortunately Rosenkranz mentions no dates. This is highly regrettable, especially as the reader of this book can see that he has misinterpreted Hegel's attitude to England. We do not possess a single remark by Hegel that would lend support to Rosenkranz's view that Hegel was 'ever a great admirer of the English constitution or that he regarded it as a model. Understandably enough he did not concern himself closely with England. On the contrary, the annotated translation of Cart which was written shortly after his arrival in Frankfurt and its sharp criticism of the reactionary policies of England seems to have arisen as an echo of the French Revolution (see p. 110). Thus Hegel's interest in England seems to have grown in connection with his research into the nature and laws of bourgeois society during his stay in Frankfurt. It would be both important and interesting to discover the precise moment at which Hegel took up these studies since, in view of the relatively swift changes in Hegel's views during the years of crisis in Frankfurt, a knowledge of the exact dates is very necessary.

But Hegel's interest was not confined to the English economy; he also took up the study of economic theory. With reference to this Rosen kranz states:

'All of Hegel's ideas about the nature of civil society, about need and labour, about the division oflabour and the wealth of the estates, about poverty, the police, taxation, etc', are ffnally concentrated in a commentary on the German translation of Steuart's book on political economy which he wrote between.19 February and 16 May 1799, and which has survived intact. It contains a number of magnificant insights into politics and history and many subtle observations.

Steuart was a supporter ofthe mercantilist system. With noble passion and a host of interesting illustrations, Hegel attacked the deadness of this system and sought to preserve man's soul (das Gemiit) in the midst r                         . 1            1                      ri 1              1 r

of competition, the mechanization oflabour and of commerce. J

We need not waste words on thesejejune, uncomprehending remarks. But even from this meagre summary we can see what an important document we have lost. It is perfectly obvious that Hegel approached the problems of economics from the point of view of his critique of dead positivity and we would have a much clearer picture of his early attitudes to bourgems society if only we still possessed these first investigations into economic theory.

Another factor here is that Rosenkranz's account poses an insoluble problem. In the last sentence Rosenkranz claims that Hegel sought to save man's soul amidst the mechanism of capitalist society. This would suggest that Hegel's thoughts were running on similar lines to those of the reactionary Romantics. In view ofHegel's later development and the general character of what we have seen ofhis philosophical and social attitudes, this sounds highly improbable. It is true enough that it was only later on that Hegel made his famous remark that the rational is real and the real is rational； but in a general sense it may be said to constitute the unconscious leitmotiv ofall his thought from Frankfurt onwards. In the course of our examination of Hegel's economic notes in Jena we shall have occasion to remark on his closeness to the 'cynical', the ruthlessly truthful views of the English classical economists who were perfectly willing to expose all the horrors and scandals of capitalist society, while asserting that capitalism was essentially progressive. For this reason we believe that Rosenkranz simply misunderstood Hegel. However, since we can offer no irrefutable proof of our assertion, and since it is an abstract possibility that Hegel did for a short time incline towards Romantic economics, we can only regard our rejection of Rosenkranz's interpretation as a hypothesis. Nevertheless, we believe that the reader who nas followed the entire development of Hegel's thought will agree that our hypothesis is correct.

It is not really possible to estimate the influence of Steuart's particular economic principles on Hegel. Not only because the commentary has been lost and we cannot know which sections impressed Hegel, which he agreed with and which he rejected, but also because his reading of Steuart did not lead to any immediate attempt to apply the newly-acquired economic principles to bourgeois society. What we have said earlier on about the discontinuities of the Frankfurt period applies with particular force here. Having spent three months on the problems of economics Hegel simply turned to his chief work in Frankfurt, The Spirit of Christianity. Of course, as we shall see, this essay does not neglect the problems of society, but its immediate theme is different and the change in his socio-economic views only makes itself felt in a few places and even then in the most general philosophical terms. Not until the period in Jena do we come across manuscripts which directly concern themselves with social problems and among which economics are given an explicit and prominent position. Nor can we know with any certainty just how important economic problems were in Hegel's last work in Frankfurt, the Fragment of a System of 1800, since as we shall see, only two small fragments of this work have survived. But in the Jena manuscripts there is evidence that in addition to Steuart Hegel had read the works of Adam Smith. And given the great abstractness of Hegel's statements about economics, his exclusive interest in the great, universal problems, it is hard to show the impact ofdetails.

All the same, it is highly probable that the study of Adam Smith was a turning-point in Hegel's evolution. The problem which reveals the striking parallel between Hegel's thought and the classical English economists is the problem of work as the central mode of human activity, as the chief method by which the identity of the subject-object (to use Hegel's terminology at this time) can be achieved, as the activity which annuls the deadness of objectivity, as the driving force of the process which turns mankind into the product of its own activity. And it is highly probable that this problem emerges for the first time in the course of reading Adam Smith, since neither a study of the German economy which was so backward in the context of the development ofcapitalism, nor a reading ofSteuart could really provide the necessary stimulus.

However, this is another issue which finds us reduced to hypotheses and guesswork, and we give our view in the full awareness that it is no more than a hypothesis. The first documentary evidence that Hegel had read Smith is contained in the manuscripts ofsome lectures given in Jena in 1803/4 and which were published not long ago.4 Hegel refers here to Adam Smith's statements about developing the forces of production through the division of labour in the factory and he wrote the name of Smith in the margin. But as early as 1802, in the System ofEthics, a similar, if, as we shall see, a less well-developed attitude towards work, the division oflabour etc., occupies a central position. It is therefore almost certain that Hegel was acquainted with Adam Smith right from the beginning of his period in Jena and that he had therefore overcome, at least m part, some of the limitations and defects of Steuart's theories.

Now it is our belief that Hegel's interest in classical English economics actually dates from an earlier period, namely from the time when he was already working on the Fragment of a System. It is perfectly true that that work gives us no help at all, at any rate not directly, since the surviving fragments contain only very meagre references to economic problems and we have no idea how Hegel had thought of the structure of the whole essay, nor indeed how far it was from completion. But in the course of some very obscure reflections on the philosophy of religion there is a very remarkable passage which may help to throw light on an extremely dark section ofHegel's intellectual evolution.

In this fragment Hegel deals with the place of religion in man's life, with the annulment of objectivity, of dead positivity in relation to men and things. The social and philosophical problems that this discussion provokes must be postponed for our detailed analysis of the enure fragment. We wish here to emphasize only one moment. Hegel writes:

'But it is necessary that he [man] should also put himselfinto a permanent relation with objects and thus maintain their objectivity even to the point ofcompletely destroying them'.

In the Frankfurt manner already familiar to us, Hegel analyses man's relation to property and hence to the dialectics of positivity and life. In this fragment he finds a solution in a very curious and highly mystical theory of sacrifice. He continues:

Man would still be unable to unite himself with the infinite life because he would have kept something for himself; he would still be in a state ofmastering things or caught in a dependence upon them. This is the reason why he gives up only part ofhis property as a sacrifice, for it is his fate to possess property, and this fate is necessary and can never be discarded. . . . Only through this useless destruction, through this destruction for the sake of destruction, does he make good the destruction which he causes for his own particular purposes. At the same time he has consummated the objectivity of the objects by a destruction unrelated to his own purposes, by that complete negation of relations which is called death. This aimless destruction for destruction's sake sometimes happens, even if the necessity of a purposive destruction of objects remains, and it proves to be the only religious relation to absolute objects. * 5

At first sight this passage is certainly obscure enough. Sacrifice is thought of as a religious way out of the necessary 'fate' of the world of property, ofbourgeois society. What is ofinterest to us is the distinction between sacrifice which is viewed as 'useless destruction', 'destruction for destruction's sake', and a concept of 'purposive destruction' which remains utterly unexplained in this context. The fragment from which we are quoting is the last sheet, i.e. the conclusion ofHegel's manuscript. If Hegel fails even to hint at what he means by what is obviously an important concept, this can only be explained by arguing that it must have been elucidated in the earlier parts of the essay, now lost. But enough has been said to indicate that 'purposive destructmn' refers to the normal, everyday relation of man to the world of objects. The point of the sacrifice is precisely to raise man beyond that realm.

We must postpone for the time being our discussion of the meaning of sacrifice for Hegel. Our subsequent analyses, especially ofhisJena theory of society, will show that the concept is not a religious or mystical one but that it is intimately connected with the illusions Hegel cherished at this time about the possibility of resolving the contradictions of bourgeois society. What interests us here is rather the concept with which it is contrasted, viz. the 'purposive destruction' ofthe objects. In order to decipher this apparently no less obscure notion we must have recourse to the System of Ethics written two years later in Jena. It is evident that the idea is connected with work. Hegel deffnes work in the System of Ethics in language reminiscent of Schelling's, as is much in the first part of his stay in Jena, as the 'destruction of the object', and indeed as its purposive destruction. The first dialectical triad from which his thought proceeds is: need, work, enjoyment. Work is then defined as follows:

'The destruction ofthe object, or of intuition (Anschuauung), but as a moment (i.e. not finally and absolutely) so that this destruction is replaced by another intuition or object; or else it establishes the pure identity, activity of the act of destruction; . . . it does not destroy the object as object in general, but in such a way that another is put in its place ... this destruction, however, is work*

Admittedly, this definition does not contain the word 'purposive', but if we follow Hegel's line of thought carefully here and see how he moves from work to the tools of work and from tools to machines, it is evident that the idea is present and only the word is missing, and the word is only missing because it is supererogatory in this context. The connection between work and purposiveness remains henceforth a basic fact of Hegel's thought. Even in his treatment of theology in the Logic work continues to play an extraordinarily important part, as Lenin has expressly pointed out in various notes.

We believe, therefore, that the conception of work which is so essential a category in the Jena System of Ethics was already present m the lost parts of the Frankfurt Fragment of a System. And this makes it extremely probable that Hegel studied Adam Smith's Wealth of Nations as a preliminary to the latter work. (We must add in passing that the works of both Steuart and Smith were available in Germany at this time in various translations.)

In the circumstances it is exceptionally difficult to isolate the influence of particular English economists on particular ideas of Hegel's. However, we may draw attention to a number of elements in Steuart which undoubtedly had a lasting effect. Above all, Steuart was, as Marx shows, the real historian of economics among the classics; he was more interested in the social origins of capitalism than its inner workings which he grasps less well than his successors.7 And at this stage in Hegel's career, when he was concerned to establish the historical necessity of bourgeois society, the sheer volume ofinformation in Steuart's work and the constant comparisons between ancient and modern economies must have made a deep impression on him.

Beyond that, however, it can be argued that Hegel may have found it much easier to accept certain retrograde elements in Steuart, views which had been superseded by Smith's much clearer and more radical insights. No doubt, Hegel fought dead positivity wherever he found it and this would have led him to sympathize with Smith's efforts to eliminate certain obsolete elements ofthe old economics, with its wholesale fetishizations. But such outmoded views may have deep roots in the economies ofhackward nations. The relation between the economy and the state, for example, could only be analysed consistently in England, in the works of Smith and Ricardo. Marx has frequently shown how French economists ofthe Napoleonic era clung to all sorts of outmoded attitudes on that very question. This was even truer of Germany, and the very much slower growth of economics in Germany meant that misconceptions about the economic role of the state lasted well beyond Hegel's day. (One need think only ofLassalle and Rodbertus.) When in addition we remind ourselves that Hegel in hisJena penod entertained many false hopes about the possibilities ofresolving the antinomies ofbourgeois society along Napoleonic lines, it is only too easy to understand why Hegel should have leant more towards Steuart than Smith on this issue.

But there is one further respect in which Hegel never departs from a view held by Steuart, and never reaches the point of understanding the great advances made by Adam Smith and Ricardo in formulating the laws underlying capitalist economics. We refer to the problem of surplus labour and surplus value. Marx, in his critique of Steuart's economics, makes the point that Steuart remained imprisoned within the old theory of making a 'profit upon alienation'. It is true that Steuart does distingmsh between positive andrelative profit. The latter is profit upon alienation. Marx says of the former:

'Positive profit anses from "augmentation of labour, industry and ingenuity". How it arises from this Steuart makes no attempt to explain. The further statement that the effect of this profit is to augment and swell "the public good" seems to indicate that Steuart means by it nothing hut the greater mass of use-values produced in consequence of the development of the productive powers of labour, and that he thinks of this positive profit as quite distinct from capitalists' profit——which always presupposes an increase ofexchange value. '8

When we come to consider Hegel's economic views in Jena we shall see how deeply entangled he is in ideas of this sort which were so retrograde by English standards. The more progressive ideas that he had gained from a study ofAdam Smith and a greater awareness of the facts ofthe English economy do indeed enable him to perceive certain economic contradictions in capitalism, particular antagonisms between capital and labour and he is able to discuss these frankly. But he never succeeds in unveiling the mystery of real capitalist exploitation, indeed he never approaches as close to it as the English bourgeois economists. This is a barrier he will never surmount and the reason is not far to seek: his knowledge of the conflict between capital and labour only comes to him from reading about international economic relations, not from his own experience, from a real insight into capitalism in ordinary life. That is to say, the barrier here is an intellectual mirror of the primitive economy ofGermany.

Naturally, the size of the barrier is even further increased by Hegel's own idealism, in particular by his inversion of the relationship between law and the state on the one hand and economics on the other. But, as we have shown, his idealism is itselfrooted in the same soil. Thus the economic backwardness of Germany does not have any single direct influence on Hegel, nor does it directly distort many of his most brilliant insights into bourgeois society. Its effects are various, complex and often impinge on his thought in unexpected ways.

We shall discuss Hegel's economic views in detail when we come to analyse his attempts to systematize them in Jena. For the present it is enough if we briefly indicate the immediate effects of Hegel's study of economics and the nature of his approach to the problems of bourgeois society. The decisive moment is contained in the long passage from the Fragment of a System already quoted: from this point onwards Hegel regards economics, the economic life of men, their determination by their economic relation to each other and to things as an inexorable 'fate'. (The Hegelian concept of fate will be analysed fully in the next chapter.) We have already seen the seeds of this view (p. i i9f.) m the first notes of the Frankfurt period when Hegel made a number of complex observations on the possibility of harmonizing property relations with love.

But the idea was only treated sporadically there; here it becomes a crucial issue. Earlier on it was just one of the problems of subjective love, here we find it defined as fate and opposed to the highest representative of religion, Jesus. Part of Hegel's conception of fate in Frankfurt is the idea that to struggle against a hostile power has the same consequences as to evade it; this is in fact the expression of the inevitability of fate.9 However mystical many of Hegel s utterances sound on this point, they yet contain a much more realistic core of truth about history and society than is to be found m the other German philosophers ofthis time: namely his rejection of the very common idea, still prevalent among intellectuals, that a man can stand above his age and his society, that he can take up a theoretical or practical position from a standpoint 'external' to his society.

In this sense property is treated in the Spirit of Christianity as an ineluctable fate. Since in that essay Hegel's reflections concentrate on the possibility of realizing the teaching ofJesus in society, it is natural that he should keep returning to the passage in the New Testament about the rich young man whom Jesus advised to dispose of his property to gain salvation. We may remember that Hegel had already referred to this passage in Berne (p. 63), but there he had confined himself to the observation that it illustrated his argument that Christianity is concerned exclusively with 'private individuals'. At that stage he was not interested in the economic implications.

Only now does he focus on the latter, but he does so with a vengeance. In the plan for The Spirit of Christianity he is only concerned with Jesus' escape from economics. Since property and possessions cannot constitute 'a beautiful condition oflife'Jesus turns away from them. The next step in Hegel's development is that he tacitly dismisses the various subjective compromises with which he had experimented. He says:

'The kingdom ofGod is a condition in which God rules, and all determinations and rights are annulled; hence his words to the young

man: go, kingdom


sell that thou hast—it is hard for a rich man to enter into the of God;——hence, too, Christ's renunciation of all pos


sessions and all honour—these relauons with father, family, property cannot become beautiful, therefore they should not exist at all, so that at least the opposite state ofaffairs might not exist either. . . . '10

No further consequences are deduced in the plan.

But the corresponding passage in the text of the full manuscript speaks a very different language. We shall see that Hegel has a much closer, more approving attitude towardsJesus in this work than he ever had in Berne. Despite this the Berne writings never contained such scathing comments on Jesus' teaching as this one. (In Berne Hegel's satire had been aimed more at Christiamty than at the church.) Hegel reverts to the parable ofthe rich young man and says:

'About the command which follows to cast aside care for one's life and to despise riches, as also about Matthew xix, 23: "How hard it is for a rich man to enter the kingdom of Heaven", there is nothing to be said; it is a litany pardonable only in sermons and rhymes, for such a command is without truth for us. The fate of property has become too powerful for us to tolerate reflections on it, to find its abolition thinkable. But this at least is to be noticed, that the possession of riches, with all the rights as

well as all the cares connected with it, brings into human life definitive details whose restrictedness prescribes limits to the virtues, imposes conditions on them, and makes them dependent on circumstances. Within these limitations, there is room for duties and virtues, but they allow of no whole, of no complete life, because if life is bound up with objects, it is conditioned by something outside itself, since in that event something is tacked on to life as its own which yet cannot be its property. Wealth at once betrays its opposition to love, to the whole, because it is a right caught in a context of multiple rights, and this means that both its immediately appropriate virtue, honesty, and also the other virtues possibly within its sphere, are of necessity linked with exclusion, and every act of virtue is in itself one of a pair of opposites. A syncretism, a service of two masters, is unthinkable because the indeterminate and the determinate cannot retain their form and still be bound together. '11

We can see here that Hegel has gone far towards recognizing the necessity of bourgeois society, even though his insight is still clothed in the mystical terminology of his view of fate. We see also, harking back to the last chapter, that his attack on Kantian ethics, his assertion that a conflict of duties is inevitable is closely bound up with the conception of society now slowly crystallizing. We shall now see, in the course of our analysis of the longest manuscript of the Frankfurt period, that on the basis of this conception the tragic conflict of values now reaches right into Hegel's view of religion and affects his attitude towards Jesus himself^ even though it was Jesus Hegel had looked to, in Frankfurt above all, to resolve all these conflicts. We shall also see that we are dealing with a contradiction which runs through Hegel's entire idealist dialectic, one which he will later attempt to resolve at a much higher level, but without any greater success.

NOTES

1  Lenin, Collected Works, Vol. 38, London and Moscow 1963, p. 180.

2  Rosenkranz, p. 85.

3   Ibid., p. 86.

4  Realphilosophie, Vol. I, p. 239.

5  Nohl, p. 349f. Knox, pp. 315-16. All italics by G.L.

6  Lasson, p. 420.

7  Marx, Theories of Surplus Value, Vol. I, p. 43.

8  Ibid., p. 41.

9  Nohl, p. 284.

IO Ibid., p. 397

II Ibid., p. 273f. Italics by G.L.

The Spirit of Christianity and its Fate
We have already made the acquaintance of a number of important passages from this, the most extensive work of Hegel's Frankfurt period.1 Our present task is to evaluate the philosophical ideas it contains and estimate their importance in Hegel's evolution. The essay is a great debate with Christianity. We have already shown in detail how Hegel's new view ofbourgeois society forced him to reconsider his attitude to Christianity. We have seen how the nature of his development led him to think of Christianity in a more or less approving way. However, his approach in Frankfurt differs qualitatively from that ofJena. As we have seen, and shall see still more clearly, Hegel considers the problems of bourgeois society from the standpoint of an individual living in it. By the time he comes toJena, the general social perspective prevails over that of the individual. From this time on the individual is no more than a member of society, his individual problems are consistently treated in the light of general social ones. (The role of economics and of a dialectics of the general and the particular, deepened by the assimilation ofeconomic categories, is a matter to be discussed later on in that context.) But since, at present, Hegel's starting-point is the fate of the individual, it is natural that Christianity should have a much more immediate appeal for him than it had done earlier on. Hence the question of how an individual's life should be shaped and conducted was bound to lead to a reconsideration ofChristian ethics.

We may say, then, that Hegel never felt so close emotionally to Christianity as at this time. But it would be a great error to infer from this that a feeling of closeness is the same thing as a total doctrinal agreement with the tenets of Christianity, as the reactionary neo-Hegelians never tire of asserting. Lasson and Haering m particular arc always at pains to prove that the key to an understanding of Hegel's whole philosophy lies in his complete agreement with Protestantism.

How little these legends have m common with reality can be gauged from the question about which the enure essay revolves and the -—admittedly hesitant and contradictory——soluuon which Hegel advances. Hegel's starting-point is the question: is the solution to the problems of life put forward by Jesus and His church correct and is it still viable in the modern world?

'This idea of a kingdom of God completes and comprises the whole of the Christian religioh asJesus founded it, and we have still to consider whether it completely satisfies nature or whether his disciples were impelled by any need to something beyond, and, if so, what that need was.>.z

The answers that Hegel gives in the course of the essay have a fairly negative ring. He proceeds from the mystical dogmas of Christianity and attempts to show that it only achieved its religious objectivity, the supersession of a merely subjective love, through the resurrection of Christ. But this in turn gives rise to a state ofmind 'which is more like a hovering between reality and spirit. . . .' And thus an opposition remained

'which, with further development, was bound to become a pairing of living and dead, divine and actual. By conjoining the man Jesus with the glorified and deified Jesus, this vagueness pointed to a satisfaction of the deepest urge for religion, but it did not provide this satisfaction, and the urge was thus turned into an endless, unquenchable, and unappeased longing.'

Thus according to Hegel, Christianity in its maturity does achieve a 'union' (and we have seen what this term means to Hegel in Frankfurt) but one which

'remains eternally in their [i.e. men's] consciousness and never allows religion to become a perfected life. In all the forms of the Christian religion which have been developed in the advancing fate of the ages, there lies this fundamental characteristic of opposition in the divine which is supposed to be present in consciousness only, never in life.'

And Hegel goes on to give a brief account of the various currents in Christianity, showing that none of them is able to achieve the real union with life, the real annulment of positivity. And he concludes the essay with the words:

'And it is its fate that church and state, worship and life, piety and virtue, spiritual and worldly action, can never dissolve into one. 'J

It is evident that Hegel's final answer is by no means wholly in favour of Christianity. The contradictory character of this essay lies in the fact that he feels impelled to look to religion as the only thing that can provide an answer to positivity in life, and likewise he is driven to regard Christianity as the prototype of religion, and yet, after all the mystical constructions that go a long way towards Christianity, he ffnds himself forced to come to a negative conclusion about it, viz. that Christianity is incapable of annulling the dead, the positive element oflife and that ultimately it is just as subjective a response to the world of dead objects as love and that it likewise allows this world to persist unanulled.

We shall see that Hegel never takes these assertions to their logical conclusion. His attitude will always remain tentative and ambiguous. But of this period less than any other can it be maintained that he was fully in accord with Christianity. Indeed, in Jena we shall encounter a fragment which explicitly speaks of the supersession of Christianity and the birth of a new, third religion. Of course, here too, Hegel's overcoming of Christianity takes place in the name of religion. He can never escape from the trammels of religious ideas which are so profoundly related to his idealism and this has the effect that in his view of society Christianity not only plays the role of a real social force, but it is also invested with a philosophical nimbus precisely because it is a religion.

However, Hegel's attitude to Chrisuanity is riddled with contradictions and we should try and throw some light on them from the outset if we wish to clarify his later writings. He criticizes the Christian community because its love is unable to annul pos1t1vity.

'But in the lifelessness of the group's love the spirit of its love remained so athirst, felt itself so empty, that it could not fully recognize in itself, living in itself, its corresponding spirit; on the contrary, to this spirit it remained a stranger. To be connected with an alien spirit, felt as alien, is to be conscious of dependence on it.'

Opposition remains and

'is something positive, an object which has in it as much foreignness, as much dominion, as there is dependence in the spirit of the group.，4

Of course, Hegel is speaking here of the Christian group and not ofJesus himself, and we shall see that this distinction is important for him at this period.

In Hegel's eyes, the discovery that Christianity does not do away with positivity is of decisive importance for the entire subsequent history of the religion. The more complex human relations become, i.e. the more civil society advances, the more blatant this contradiction becomes.

'This is the point at which the group is caught in the toils of fate, even though, on the strength of the love which maintained itself in its purity outside every tie with the world, it seemed to have evaded fate altogether. Its fate, however, was centred in the fact that the love which shunned all ties was extended over a group; and this fate was all the more developed the more the group expanded and, owing to this expansion, continually coincided more and more with the world's fate both by unconsciously adopting many of that fate's aspects and also by continually becoming sullied itself in the course of its struggle against that fate.5

Moreover, there is no lack of very explicit statements alleging that even the founder of Christianity was unable to put an end to positivity. Such criticism refers again and again to Jesus' relations with the state, with the orgamzation of society. (We have already discussed his relation to private property in the preceding section.) About society and the state he writes as follows:

'The kingdom ofGod isnot ofthis world, only itmakes a great difference for that kingdom whether this world is actually present in opposition to it, or whether its opposition does not exist but is only a possibility. The former was in fact the case, and it was with full knowledge of this that Jesus suffered at the hands of the state. Hence with this [passive] relation one great element in a living union is cut away; for the members ofthe kingdom of God one important bond of association is snapped; they have lost one part of freedom . . . they have lost a number of active relationships and living ties. The citizens of the kingdom of God become set over against a hostile state, become private persons excluding themselves from it. . . . It is true that from the idea ofa kingdom of God all the relationships established in a political order are excluded; these rank mffnitely lower than the living bonds within the divine group, and by such a group they can only be despised. But since the state was there and neither Jesus nor his followers could annul it, the fate ofJesus and his following (which remamed true to him in this matter) remains a loss of freedom, a restriction of life, passivity under the domination of an alien might which was despised but which ceded to Jesus without conditions the little that he wanted from it—xistence among his people.专

The internal contradiction in Hegel's position appears with particular clanty where he makes the attempt to describe the total annulment of all dead objectivity in the kingdom of God. He adduces many illustrations, above all from the sphere of organic life, to show that the relation between the part and the whole (individual and society) need not necessarily conform to the pattern prevailing in bourgeois society of an artificial bond which unites an empty subjectivity with a world of dead objects incapable of being stimulated into life. But when he attempts to describe such a society he is forced to seek analogies in the social relations of primitive peoples:

'Even in the expression "a son of Koresh", for example, which the Arabs use to denote the individual, a single member of the clan, there is the implication that this individual is not simply a part of the whole: the whole does not lie outside him; he himselfis just the whole which the enure clan is. This is clear too from the sequel to the manner of waging war peculiar to such a natural, undivided people: every single individual is put to the sword in the most cruel fashion. In modern Europe, on the other hand, where each individual does not carry the whole state in himself but where the bond is only the conceptual one ofthe same rights for all, war is waged not against the individual, but against the whole which lies outside him. As with any genuinely free people, so among the Arabs, the individual is a part and at the same time the whole. It is true only of objects, of things lifeless, that the whole is other than the parts; in the living thing, on the other hand, the part of the whole is one and the same as the whole. .,

The fact that Hegel is forced to appeal to primitive peoples in order to illustrate his belief that the positivity of bourgeois society can be annulled with the aid of religion gives a very clear indication of the impasse in which his thought found itself. Many critics of bourgeois society have sought to escape from its contradictions into less developed, more 'organic' societies. It is this that the Romantics expected from the Middle Ages. Hegel's efforts to do away with positivity necessarily drive him in this direction. It says a lot for his realism that he rejects the Middle Ages and feudalism in favour of peoples still at the tribal level of organization. He sees the relation of man to society in a fundamentally different manner from that obtaining in bourgeois society, and the ideas he works out here prove extremely fruitful later on in his studies ofart, history and law. On the other hand, even in Frankfurt Hegel thought of the development of human society from primitive conditions to modern bourgeois society not simply as an actual necessity, but also as an historical advance. After all, he does show, as we have seen, that the Christian community was constantly forced to adapt itself in the course of history to the requirements ofa more developed and developing society.

Thus Hegel finds himself confronted by an insoluble contradiction: the 'kingdom of God' which is supposed to resolve the contradictions of modern society turns out to be a long-since-obsolete and superseded condition of man. Hegel is forced to choose between his religious ideal and his belief in the progress of history. It is characteristic of the Frankfurt period that his answer is less mcisive than it will be later on. Not that he ever went so far as to proclaim the need to regress to a primitive society or to deny the concept ofhistorical progress. Both ideas, especially the belief in the necessity of progress beyond the primitive, are common in his notes. But on the one hand, he is as yet incapable of giving a comprehensive picture of the general development of world history and hence is unable to place such societies within the process, and on the other hand his discussions of the philosophy of religion frequently show signs of a 'suprahistorical' tendency, a tendency to embrace the 'eternity' of the believer. Then again this tendency is criticized and annulled. It is typical of the Frankfurt manuscripts, however, that criticism and the thing criticized often dwell peaceably side by side. Hegel does indeed expose the tragic contradictions of religion and he regards the founder of Christianity as a tragic figure; but at the same time, a religious solution remains the preferred solution throughout this period, especially, as we shall see, in the Fragment of a System.

But all these contradictions have another aspect for Hegel. When we find Hegel recording all these contradictions and uttering negative judgments about Christianity we may well find it hard to understand why he attributed so much importance to the question. We have earlier pointed to the social conditions which necessitated a debate with Christianity and indicated why Hegel found it so hard to break away (cf p. 98ff.). But the question must be raised again here: how did the situation arise which could encourage Hegel to imagine thatJesus might be a serious solution to the contradictions oflife and ofbourgeois society? The answer is to be sought above all in Hegel's idealism. His entire development, especially in Frankfurt, is an outstanding illustration of Lenin's aphorism that 'Idealism is clerical obscurantism', i.e. philosophical idealism cannot, if it remains true to its premises, evade the claims of religion.8

Up to now we have seen Hegel's growing insight into the workings of bourgeois society. This has meant above all an insight into a variety of necessary negative manifestations ofthat society, ofthe alienation of man from the world, from his fellow men, from things and the alienated form of the state and society itself. These universal properties of capitalism inevitably appeared in a heightened form in Germany, as Marx was to explain many decades later:

'In all the other spheres, we like the rest of Continental Western Europe, suffer not only from the development of capitalist production, but also from the incompleteness of that development. Alongside of modern evils, a whole series of inherited evils oppress us, ansing from the passive survival of antiquated modes of production, with their inevitable train of social and political anachronisms. We suffer not only from the living, but from the dead. '9

Marx's statement here applies doubly to Germany in Hegel's day. What he describes here determined not only what Hegel could see and had to see of society, but also the way m which he approached such problems; that is to say, it determined his philosophical idealism. The contradictions he perceived must have seemed all the greater because he was attempting to tackle them from the standpoint and with the equipment of the best bourgeois humamsm which was indeed about to cast off the heroic illusions of the pre-revolutionary and revolutionary epochs, but which was very far from acquiescing in the social and cultural monstrosities produced by capitalism. The post-revolutionary character of this humanism inclined it to strive for a solution to the contradictions in society just as it was. All hopes that society might be radically transformed had disappeared, partly because of events in France and partly because of the situation in Germany itself where there was no real social basis for a revolutionary movement or even any sort of radical reorganization. We have repeatedly shown that in this general configuration of events, Hegel followed the same path as Goethe and Schiller, the most outstanding humanists ofthe period in Germany.

This entire problematic gives Hegel's efforts to overcome positivity the particular shape that is so characteristic of the Frankfurt period. We have already seen, and shall see more clearly still, how in the course ofhis development an historical dialectic unfolds: the dialectic ofthe origins of 'dead' forms of life, alienated from society, which retain their positive, dead appearances whilst proving themselves to be the necessary products of the social activity of men themselves.

Because ofhis basic idealist stance, however, this problem is inseparable from another, more general one, the problem of objectivity. These two issues are linked to each other only because ofHegel's idealism; they have otherwise no necessary connection, but the fact that they are so connected is responsible for the ineradicable religious overtones of his attempts to overcome positivity. For he is not concerned simply to show that all the positive* phenomena in society are the products ofhuman activity; his idealism forces him to overstate his case and require the elimination ofobjectivity as such.

It is evident that this can only be achieved from a religious position. In this respect Hegel is more open and uninhibited in Frankfurt than he is later on. He really does regard religion as the pinnacle ofphilosophy; it is the annulment ofpositivity in terms of the religious union of man with God. This goal remains fixed despite the fact that his rapidly growing knowledge of society and history, his own cool self-possession and his integrity as a thinker generate insights in glaring contradiction with such a view. We see here one of the basic and indestructible evils of ab

solute idealism. And when Hegel in his more down-to-earth phase in Jena does away with the religious key-stone to this system, substituting for it the realm of absolute knowledge and scientific, i.e. dialectical philosophy, the change is more apparent than real. For the identical subject-object of absolute idealism, the return of absolute spirit from its total alienation in nature and its partial alienation in history to the per


fected knowledge of itself^ is ultimately nothing other than the absorption of all objectivity into the mystified subject which has allegedly cal approach. But it can only do so if it proves possible to dispense with the old Enlightenment view that the real causes of change in society and history are to be sought in the conscious motives of the individual actors, and that the effects can be fully explained in these terms; i.e. a dialectical approach will only work if we go beneath the surface and search for the real and objective causes ofhistorical movement. We know that Hegel was never really able to take this step and that in his view of history the decisive role is played by his idealistically mystified conception of the spirit. Nevertheless, it is sufficiently clear, and Marx and Engels have frequently pointed out, that despite this mystification Hegel's view ofhistory is a decisive advance since he sees both that history is in some sense made by men themselves, and that the conscious actions of men always result in something more than what was intended.

created it: viz. the annulment ofall objectivity.


But for all this mysticism Hegel's conception of a society and history 1 1                .1           1         1                  - i r r 1 . r 1 • 1

made by men themselves does provide a firm foundanon for a dialecti


This conception of history only emerged in later years. In order to reach that point it was necessary to abandon his Frankfurt approach from the standpoint of the individual. But even this must not be misconstrued in any rigid or mechanical fashion. Even though the fate of the individual remains a kind ofleitmotiv throughout the penod and as such is one of the factors responsible for the culmination of his thought in religion, the entire period is marked by an unbroken striving to break out of the subjectivity such an approach must engender. And ifhis solution is a sort of mystical pseudo-objectivity of the religious life this internal debate does nevertheless prepare the way for his later more objective, dialectical approach to both history and society.

We have seen how this internal debate centres immediately on the dialectics of love, i.e. on the erection of dialectical relations between the dead objectivity of social institutions and the real life of the individual. We have also seen that what Hegel meant by love was the annulment of false objectivity, ofpositivity.

This set of problems determines Hegel's view of Jesus in Frankfurt. He describes the mission of Jesus in a variety of ways but its content is always the same in essence. In the draft of The Spirit of Christianity Hegel writes:

Jesus opposes moral commandments to the moral predisposition, i.e. the mclination to act in a particular way; inclination has its foundation in itself^ it contains its own ideal object; and not in anything alien, in the moral law ofreason. '10

And in the fmal manuscript he says much the same thing, though perhaps a little more emphatically:

'Over against the positivity of the Jews, Jesus set man; over against the laws and their obligatoriness he set the virtues and in these the immorality of"positive" man is overcome. '11

These statements about the mission ofJesus are in harmony with what we have learnt about Hegel's conception of love, of which Jesus is in Hegel's eyes the greatest incarnation in history. But this does not exhaust the significance ofeitherJesus or his teaching. On the contrary, with increasing clarity Hegel analyses the strengths and weaknesses of love as a means of overcoming positivity, and we recollect that at this stage Jesus' mission was precisely to break down all the barriers to love and to reconcile its contradictions at a higher level. We shall see bow Hegel's efforts led to the reproduction ofthe contradictions oflove on a higher plane.

The chief defect oflove is its tendency to isolate. It is no more than a passing moment in the flux oflife. "Love joins points into moments, but in love the world, man and domination persist.，12 Ofcourse, love implies a continual effort to go beyond the momentary, but he states repeatedly that this effort must fail.

'This is why beautiful souls who are unhappy, either because they are conscious of their fate or because they are not satisfied in the fullness oftheir love, are so full of charity—they have beautiful moments of enjoyment, but only moments. n3

Thus what love lacks according to Hegel is objectivity. It is one manifestation ofthe divine principle in man, but it is not able to create a living relationship between subject and object.

'This love is a divine spirit, but it still falls short of religion. To become religion it must manifest itself in an objective form. As a feeling, something subjective, it must be fused with the universal, with something represented in idea, and thereby acquire the form of a being to whom prayer is both possible and due. The need to unite subject with object, to unite feeling, and feeling's demand for objects, with the intellect, to unite them in something beautiful, in a god, by means of fancy, is the supreme need of the human spirit and the urge to religion.'"

This then is the crucial message of the Frankfurt period: religion is the sphere in which a living objectivity identical with subjectivity is to be achieved.

Even inthe draft we find a dialectical hierarchy ofhuman attitudes.

'Morality annuls positivity, the objectivity of the commandments; love annuls the barriers of morality; religion annuls the barriers of love.'15

The idea is reproduced a degree more emphatically in the final manuscript.

'Morality annuls domination within the sphere of consciousness; love annuls the barriers in the sphere of morality; but love itself is still incomplete in nature. In the moments ofhappy love there is no room for objectivity; yet every reflection annuls love, restores objectivity again, and with objectivity we are once more on the territory of re-strictions.The religious, then, is the nA.tjpW,ua] fulfilment] oflove;it is reflection and love umted, bound together in thought. '16

This idea is methodologically interesting in two respects. Firstly, we see here a relatively developed form of what was going to become a basic method of approach in The Phenomenology of Mind, namely the practice of allowing the various subjective postures towards the world——what Hegel was to call the 'configurations' of consciousness* [Gestalten des Bewusstseins]——to develop dialectically from each other. The way this happens is that a given attitude always appears as a resolution of the contradictions to be found on a lower level, while it generates contradictions of its own to be resolved at a higher one. This method is not exclusive to Hegel, but a general characteristic of the whole period. We fmd it in embryo in Kant, and Schelling's System of Transcendental Idealism exemplifies the fully developed method. We shall reserve our analysis of the similarities and differences between Hegel and Schelling for our discussion oftheJena period.

The second point of methodological interest here is the great importance attributed to reflection in his dialectical deduction of religion. We have several times pointed out that the emphasis on reflection as a moment in the dialectical totality is one of the salient characteristics of the Frankfurt period, one which sets Hegel apart from the vitalists and Romantics with whom his imperialist commentators like to associate him. The function of reflection is particularly crucial here, for according to Hegel the absence of reflection is precisely the weak point of love which in consequence can always be destroyed by reflection, since love has merely evaded instead of integrating it. And by contrast with this, the objectivity ofreligion lies in its union oflove and reflection, its reconciliation ofthese antithetical principles.”

But at this stage ofHegel's development these correct insights and anticipations of his future thought simply exacerbate the insoluble problems of the moment. It is clear from what we have said up to now that reflection is a means of getting to grips with reality, a means which is closely bound up with the phenomenon of 'opposition', of which it is indeed the intellectual correlative. Now if the religious unity of life is meant to achieve the total annulment of all objectivity alien to the subject without leaving a trace, then the annulment of reflection is no true dialectical annulment in the Hegelian sense (i.e. with the additional meanings of preservation and elevation to a higher plane). It is rather a total annihilation in the style of Schelling. But if, on the other hand, reflection is annulled in this dialectical sense then how can the objectless 'objectivity' ofreligious life aspired to by Hegel be realized?

It is obvious that contradictions of this sort in the premises can only lead to contradictions in the conclusions. Later on Hegel will strive to synthesize these contradictions dialectically in 'absolute knowledge' and we shall see that his philosophical idealism prevents any true solution even then. In Frankfurt where he sought the solution in religion rather than knowledge his efforts resulted in two radically opposed solutions. It is characteristic that they should stand side by side in his manuscript. Hegel obviously feels and senses their incompatibility rather than clearly perceiving it. Hence his use of obscure and contradictory categories (such as 'fate' which we shall discuss in a moment); hence too the interpretation of the personality and fate ofJesus in terms of tragedy. It is true that further reflectmn on these problems does result in the original, specifically Hegelian formulation of the theory of contradiction in The Fragment of a System, but even this can only come into its own in Jena when Hegel jettisons the methodological assumptions of the Frankfurt period: above all, the fate of the individual as a starting-point and, following logically from that, the placing of religion above knowledge.

Let us now examine somewhat more closely the contradictory solution at which Hegel had necessarily arrived. Either Hegel must take his objectless objectivity seriously——in that case everything dissolves into a haze of mysticism. Or he must remain true to his premise that reflection does not disappear within religious life but is merely annulled and dialectically preserved in it——and in that case it will become apparent that his concept ofreligion is utterly unsuited to resolve the contradictions it was designed to deal with because it will turn out to be just another formula for the subjectivity of love and so will possess its defect: its subjectivist inability to annul positivity.

(i) Let us now look at the first side of the contradiction. In the draft Hegel launches an attack on Fichte in these terms:

'That which ought to be must of course be an infinite striving if the object simply cannot be overcome, if reason and the senses, or freedom and nature, or subject and object are so opposed to each other that they become absolutes. Through the syntheses: no object——no subject, or no Eg —no non-Ego, their absolute character is not annulled. Law is a cogitated relation of objects to each other; in the kingdom of God there can be no cogitated relation, because there are no objects for each other. A cogitated relation is fixed and permanent, without spirit, a yoke, a composite thing, mastery and slavery, activity and suffering, determination and being determined."

In the manuscnpt itselfHegel discusses in greater detail the nature of religious elevation above the contradictions. We shall cite a few of the characteristic passages:

'The hill and the eye that sees it are object and subject, but between man and God, between spirit and spirit, there is no such cleft of objectivity and subjectivity; one is to the other another in that one recognizes the pther; both are one.*

Here we find the identical subject-object proclaimed in an uncompromising mystical fashion: true knowledge of the world can only be selfknowledge and absolute idealism must discover a subject which is both the creator and the knower ofthe world process. In Frankfurt Hegel declares flatly that this must be God. But this unity oflife must at the same time be a living unity, a relation between human beings within such a divine harmony. According to Hegel, this harmony is the kingdom of God. A harmony

'in which men's many-sided consciousness chimes in with one spirit and their many different lives with one life, but, more than this, by its means the partitions against other godlike beings are abolished, and the same living spirit animates the different beings, who therefore are no longer merely similar but one; they make up not a collection but a communion, since they are unified not in a universal, a concept (e.g. as believers), but through life and through love. This living harmony ofmen, their communion in God,Jesus calls the kingdom ofGod. '1

It is only logical that Hegel should express the contrast between ordinary knowledge and this, the supreme movement of the spirit, the supreme form of knowledge by using the word 'faith' to describe it. Of faith he says:

'Faith is a knowledge of spirit through spirit, and only like spirits can know and understand one another; unlike ones can know only that they are not what the other is. '21

And Hegel emphasizes that what counts here is not equal intelligence but the similar intensity ofthe spirit, offaith. He contrasts this kind ofmutual recognition with the

'much-vaunted profound knowledge of men which for divided beings, whose nature comprises many and variegated onesidednesses, a vast multiplicity without unity, is indeed a science of wide range and wide utility; but the spirit, which is what they seek, always eludes them . . . '2

This contrast is ofinterest because here too we can see an early mystical prototype ofa later idea ofgreat importance. Hegel's later conception of the historical process which, as Engels has remarked, seeks to uncover 'non-ostensible causes', is filled with just this sort of contempt for the merely pragmatic, petty psychologization of history and of the major actors in history. Again and again Hegel refers to the valet's knowledge ofhuman nature. Here, ofcourse, this contempt is different in emphasis since it is the complement ofhis rhapsodic hymn to the religious unity of mankind in God. It is obvious, however, that we do have the seeds ofhis later attitude towards psychologizing gossip and scandalmongering in the face ofthe great events ofhuman history.

The identical subject-object that lies at the roots of every form of objective idealism appears here frankly in the form of religious faith. Through faith Hegel aspires to the union ofthat divine element inherent m both God and man, a union which will bridge the 'chasm of objectivity'.

'How could anything but a spirit know a spirit? The relation of spirit to spirit is a feeling ofharmony, is their unification; how could heterogeneity be unified? Faith in the divine is only possible if in the believer himself there is a divine element which rediscovers itself, its own nature, in that on which it believes, even ifit be unconscious that what it has found is its own nature. "23

Here, where Hegel consistently follows his religious mysticism to its logical conclusion, he finishes by destroying all the dialectical discoveries that he had so laboriously striven for in Frankfurt. Everything is dissipated in the fog of objectless objectivity, the negation of any situation where objects might exist. In all the formulae he uses to describe this stage, his doctrine appears as pure mysticism. At the same time he abandons the very motif that was supposed to enable religion to overcome the limitations oflove, viz. the notion that religion is the dialectical unification oflove and reflection.

Whenever he begins to take his own idea of an objectless objectivity of religion seriously, he casts reflection ruthlessly to one side and thus demolishes all that he has carefully and artfully constructed. We need quote only a single but highly revealing instance:

'The son of God is also son of man; the divme in a particular shape appears as a man. The connection of infinite and finite is of course a "holy mystery", because this connection is life itself. Reflective thinking, which partitions life, can distinguish it into infinite and finite, and then it is only the restriction, the finite regarded by itself, which affords the concept of man as opposed to the divine. But outside reflective thinking, and in truth, there is no such restriction. 'l4

Here then, in contrast to his starting-point, Hegel presents reflection and truth as mutually exclusive concepts. This means that reflection must cease to be a necessary moment in the dialectical road to the truth, as it had been hitherto in Hegel's own view, and as it will be again from Jena onwards——a moment that can only be falsified if it is falsely made into an absolute. Now, as the absolute antithesis of truth, it is banished from the highest sphere of knowledge, from the self-recognition of spirit. It is no accident therefore that Hegel, very much in contrast to his later position, designates the self-cognition of the universal subject as faith and not knowledge. And this comes as no surprise when we see how a cardinal problem of his later dialectic, namely the relation of finite to infinite, a problem that enabled him to do away with so many metaphysical prejudices, has descended here to the level of a 'holy mystery', a religious arcanum.

(2) It is much easier to grasp the other side of the contradiction. Hegel does not consistently dissipate objectivity in a haze of mysticism; he is, especially when he comes to deal with social or historical phenomena, much too down-to-earth and realistic ro take the religious postulate of an objectivity without objects seriously. But the alternative is to leave the positivity, the unannulled dead objectivity of the social world in sole possession of the stage, while religion is seen to be a merely subjective phenomenon, not at all superior to love, and burdened with all its limitations and imperfections. A subjectivity that has become purely religious again confronts a world of dead objects and succumbs to its superior power. And this means that even the newly-won concept of God itself becomes something 'positive'. To illustrate this we have selected a passage in which Hegel gives a particularly clear, if unconscious self-criticism ofhis own mystical extremism.

'However sublime the idea of God may be made here, there yet always remains the Jewish principle of opposing thought to reality, reason to sense; this principle involves the rending oflife and a lifeless connection between God and the world, though the tie between these must be taken to be a living connection; and where such a connection is in question, ties between the related terms can be expressed only in mystical phraseology. '25

Hegel is referring here to John the Baptist and not Jesus himself who in his view represents a higher, more perfect form of the religious. In fact it isJesus who with the aid of mystical categories such as the 'son of God' and the 'kingdom of God' is assigned the role of bringing into being the state of objectless objectivity. But, as we shall see later in Hegel's treatment ofJesus as a tragic figure, the more concretely and historically he analyses his own concept the less able he is to sustain its mystical implications. This in turn leads him to turn away from the mystical side of the antinomy investigated here and back towards the world of objects.

It is clear, then, that we are not faced with a living dialectical contradiction in reality itself which Hegel has perhaps failed to grasp in

its entirety, but by crudely incompatible alternative solutions to the same problem. And the fact that these solutions are incompatible sug-L                                                                 L           D

gests that there are grave defects in Hegel's approach and method


ology. Hegel was evidently unaware of the contradiction, otherwise he would not have juxtaposed such contrary solutions in the same manuscript. Undoubtedly he sensed that all was not well and this is perhaps why he fixed on a variety ofconcepts that might help him out of the difficulty. The most important of these concepts is one of his chiefcategories in Frankfurt, that of fate.

We have already encountered this notion a number of times; we saw Hegel use the term to describe both property and the state and that this was not just picturesque illustration. On the contrary, he wished to point to a specific form ofhistorical necessity, a specific relationship between man and the positivity of the external world. At first glance it might seem as ifHegel were attempting to exorcize the obscurity ofhis philosophy ofreligion by means of a no less obscure and mystical philosophy of society and history. And indeed the concept of fate is obscure and contradictory enough. But for all that, it does contain a core of dialectical truth so that it is rewarding to look a little more closely at what Hegel meant by it.

His starting-point here is the comparison of the purely mechanical, inhuman nature ofbourgeois society, as expressed in its fetish forms, its penal code and the latter's idealization and internalization in the Kantian ethic, with the vital dialectical movement ofhuman society in general in which man is at the same time both subject and object, active agent and passive sufferer. In the eyes ofthe law the criminal is only 'a sin existent, a trespass possessed of personality'.^ And he proceeds from there to search for more broad-minded, more living and above all more human concepts of society where crime is still crime, but where the humanity of a criminal is not abrogated in such a mechanical and inhuman fashion. (We may remind the reader of similar arguments on p. 2i4f.) In his own words:

'Punishment lies directly in the offended law. The trespasser has forfeited the same right which his trespass has injured in another, i.e. he merits the punishment; the necessity that it should be meted out lies in something external and corresponds to the trespass. '7:1

Hegel goes on to conclude that the rigid necessity ofthe law, its awful 'majesty' so much admired and glorified by Kant must entail its contm-gency in life.

'Punishment is inevitably deserved; that is inescapable. But the execution ofpunishment is not inevitable, because as a characteristic of a living being it may vanish and another charactenstic may come on the scene instead. Justice thus becomes something contingent; there may be a contradiction between it as universal, as thought, and it as real, i.e. in a living being. '21

It is obvious that these observations are closely parallel to the polemical attitude towards the ethical doctrmes ofKant and Fichte which we have already discussed. This will eventually lead Hegel to reject Kant's and especially Fichte's procedure of inferring particular legal precepts from the general concept oflaw. Instead he will come to emphasize the socio-historical, more or less contingent character of particular moments of positive law.

At this stage, however, we are only concerned with his concept of fate in Frankfurt. These observations about law and crime constitute just one starting-pomt, just one complementary antithesis to it. Hegel is concerned to show that there is a more extensive, larger, more vital and hence more authentic necessity than the necessity enshrined in the law. The overestimation ofthe law in Kant and Fichte is part of the heritage of the Enlightenment, it is a widespread illusion stemming from the prerevolutionary period ofbourgems ideology. Thus Hegel's polemic here is part of a general process to free himself from many traditions ofthe Enlightenment which he had still accepted unquestioningly m Berne, but which he began to come to, grips with m Frankfurt m the process of developing his dialectical method. As we have seen, and shall frequently see agam, he often overcomes beliefs of the Enlightenment only to fall into the toils ofa mystified form ofidealism.

The concept of fate has now become the expression summing up this more broadly conceived, more dialectical and vital form of necessity.

'But fate has a more extended domain than pumshment has. It is aroused even by guilt without crime, and hence it is implicitly stricter than punishment. Its strictness often seems to pass over into the most crying injustice when it makes its appearance, more terrible than ever, over against the most exalted form of guilt, the guilt of innocence. I mean that, since laws are purely conceptual unifications of opposites, these concepts are far from exhausting the many-sidedness of life . . . but over tne relations of life which have not been dissolved, over the sides of life that are given as vitally united, over the domains of the virtues, it [i.e. punishment ] exercises no power. Fate, on the other hand, is incorruptible and unbounded like life itself. . . . Where life is mjured, be it ever so rightly, i.e. even if no dissatisfaction is felt, there fate appears, and one may therefore say "never has innocence suffered; every suffering is guilt". ,But the honour of a pure soul is all the greater the more consciously it has done mjury to life in order to maintain the supreme values, while a trespass is all the blacker, the more consciously an impure soul has

injured life.!!

Anyone acquainted with Hegel's later philosophy of history or his aesthetics will readily see here the contours of his view of historical necessity and his theory oftragedy.

What interests us most about this comparison between fate and the avenging power of punishment is the more v1tal, more comprehensive nature of fate. It is this that expresses the fundamental, if often unconscious, tendency of Hegel's Frankfurt period to see 'life', the total process of social movement, as opposed to the rigid appearance of its particular moments taken in isolation. The crucial thing here is that Hegel regards the law as emerging 'later than life and on a lower level'. Indeed in this connection he comes very close to his later dialectical view when he says ofthe law:

'It is only the lack oflife, defective life appearing as a power. And life can heal its wounds again; the severed hostile life can return mto itself again . . . The deficiency is recognized as a part of himself [i.e. the trespasser's self], as what was to have been in him and is not. This lack is not a not-being but is life known and felt as not-being.'如

Now since in Hegel's view fate represents the dialectical movement of the totality oflife, of society as a whole, since it encompasses the selfdestruction and recreation ofthat life, since it is the uninterrupted dialectical self-reproduction of society, it is not surprising that he should view fate as something essentially human, even though its rigour is even greater than that ofpunishment by the law.

'In fate, however, a man recognizes his own life, and his supplication to it is not supplication to a lord but a reversion and approach to himself. 'J1

Thus in particular instances fate may be unleashed by the deed ofanother person, but this does not alter the fact that it is still a man's own fate. For Hegel repeatedly emphasizes, as we have seen (p. ii5ff.), that for an analysis ofthe relations between man and fate it is immaterial whether a man meets his fate actively or passively, i.e. whether he flees from it or struggles against it is all one according to Hegel's view at this time.

This is underlined by his radical rejection of the Kantian view in which the individual is mechanically subordinated to society: the individual represents only the particular and society represents only the general and the individual can only attain to the level of the general by unconditionally subordinating himselfto its universal principles (the categorical imperative). Hegel repudiates this view and introduces instead a dialectic relation ofthe particular to the general. Thus the individual and society are seen as conflicting forces: one power opposes the other and the conflict between them gives birth to a revitalized living unity of the whole.

'Punishment represented as fate is of a quite different kind. In fate, punishment is a hostile power, an individual thing. . . . In the hostile power of fate universal is not severed from particular in the way in which the law, as the universal, is opposed to man or his inclinations as the particular. Fate isjust the enemy, and man stands over against it as a power fighting against it. Law, on the contrary, as universal, is lord ofthe particular and has subdued this man to obedience. '32

The view that individual and society confront each other as forces in conflict is much closer to reality than the Kantian position according to which every deviation from the law can only be regarded as something reprehensible and where, in consequence, social change in the course of history cannot be comprehended as the result of its own movement, its own contradictory self-reproduction. But Hegel's view has another aspect which emerges here: the interconnectedness of all the individual expressions of life in a society. It is the feeling, the experience (for the present no more than feeling and experience) that in everything that happens to the individual, however unique or private it may seem to be, the unity ofsocial life is objectively active. This can be seen precisely in Hegel's treatment ofthe criminal, ofhis view of the part played by fate in the criminal's misdeeds and his punishment for them.

It is a general feature ofthe period that the dialectics ofcrime became one of the focal points of literary and philosophical debate. This can be explained by the fact that the contradictions of bourgeois society were coming into the open but that their ultimate economic and class nature was not, and could not yet become visible. This process can be seen very clearly in Germany: from Schiller to Kleist's Michael Kohlhaas there is a whole series of important contributions to this theme. Moreover, the problem ofthe criminal is not of merely local German importance as is evident from a glance at European literature from Byron to BalzacY

Thus it is no mere chance or wilfulness on Hegel's part that the contradictions in the concepts of crime and the criminal should emerge so clearly in his work. Hegel emphasizes the vital impact of the whole of society on the criminal, he reveals the self-deception implicit in the notion that nothing but purely individual moments are at work here.

'The illusion of crime, its belief that it destroys the other's life and thinks itself enlarged thereby, is dissipated by the fact that the disembodied spirit ofthe injured life comes on the scene to take sidas against the crime, just as Banquo, who came as a friend to Macbeth was not obliterated when he was murdered but immediately thereafter took his seat, not as a guest at the feast, but as an evil spirit. The criminal intended to engage with another's life, but he has only destroyed his own, for life is not different Gom life, since life dwells in the one Godhead. In his arrogance he has destroyed indeed, but only the friendliness oflife; he has perverted life into an enemy. '34

When we come to consider the importance of the concept of fate for Hegel's overall development we must distinguish two moments. There is firstly the more comprehensive dialectical core which is only beginning to emerge in an as yet obscure, confused and illogical form, and secondly there is its particular Frankfurt variant which distorts the dialectical implications and deflects them from their path.

The first moment is clearly present in the passages we have quoted. In them we find a comprehensive and vital principle which divests the lifeless, 'positive* elements ofsociety oftheir lifeless, 'positive' character, transforming them into moments within the living whole. Hegel's course is here set firmly in the direction of his ultimate mature view of society as a whole which he will later formulate in the Philosophy f Right as follows:

'Necessity consists in thisthat the whole is sundered into the different concepts and that this divided whole yields a fixed and permanent de-terminacy. However, this is not a fossilized determinacy but one which permanently recreates itselfin its dissolution.，Ä

It is obvious that clarity of this sort is nowhere apparent in the passages we have quoted from the Frankfurt manuscripts. We repeat: at this stage Hegel is aware of these interconnections at the level of feeling and experience rather than coherent knowledge. But to say that his perceptions are obscure and amorphous must not blind us to their general direction. Especially as we can clearly discern some far from negligible efforts to concretize the dialectics of the universal and the particular. There is, moreover, a strong tendency to overcome the hypostasis ofthe determinations of reflection by Kant and Fichte and to locate them within the general scheme ofhis dialectic. And it is vital to see that these efforts to comprehend the 'positive' elements of society as necessary and then to annul them, by viewing them as moments in a dialectical process, stand in glaring contradiction to his religious aspirations, to his obliteration of reflection in the objectless objectivity of religious life. It is just at this point, where we can see in the swirling chaos of their conception, the ideas which will later on become the foundations of Hegelian thought, that the truth of Engels' insight into the contradiction between Hegel's system and his method really comes home to us as something which applies to Hegel's whole career. The seminal importance ofhis definition offate in Frankfurt lies precisely in these embryonic formulations of the dialectical method. And all these beginnings which were consciously intended to buttress his religious convictions in fact go in the opposite direction and turn out to be in flat contradiction with their declared objective.

But this is just one side of his conception of fate in Frankfurt, the seminal aspect which provides the foundation for his future thought. The other side, more typical of the Frankfurt period, comes to the surface when we see his attempts to refer his concept of fate, which had sprung after all from an objective base in society, back to the individual himself. Hegel's chief problem in Frankfurt is the fate of the individual in bourgeois society. His treatment of the problems of bourgeois society often drives him beyond this narrow point of view and it is at such moments that he begins to grasp real dialectical interconnections. But he consciously uses all the discoveries made in this way to help him find a solution to his chief problem. And this reference back to the individual results in a series of distortions of his own insights, oflapses to a level he had already overcome.

This is what happens to his concept of fate. When he calls fate 'human' by contrast with the legal system, the system.of punishment, the idea is rather confused but its core of truth is his belief that social life is what constitutes the human. But ifthe idea is then immediately related back to the individual it must relapse into mysticism. And this is what constantly happens to his view offate, in fact it is the conscious intention underlying the whole notion. For what Hegel deduces from the human character of fate is that it can be 'reconciled'.

Considered in the abstract the idea of reconciliation need not necessarily contradict the social character of his concept of fate. For in his attack on the 'positive' character of punishment and against the Kantian glorification of this positivity it is very clear that he does not feel hostile to the social institutions involved, but only to the form of positivity. That is to say, he stands on the same bourgeois terrain as the civil legal code and as Kantian philosophy. He does not long for another social order, but at most for a definite modification of the present one and above all, philosophically, a different view ofthe phenomena it contains and their interconnections. The mysticism only arises from the way in which Hegel pictures this reconciliation. And the general drift ofhis solution is that fate, which is a self-mutilation oflife, can be propitiated by love.

'It is in the fact that even the enemy is felt as life that there lies the possibility of reconciling fate ... This sensing oflife, a sensing which finds itself again, is love, and in love fate is reconciled . . . Thus fate is not an alien thing like punishment; it is no firmly fixed thing like an evil action is on tneconscience; fate is the consciousness oi oneself, but as of an enemy. The whole man can recreate himself in friendship, through love he can return to his pure life; his consciousness again becomes a faith in himself, his perception of himself has become another and fate is thereby reconciled.^

It is clear that in this passage, the conscious climax of his view of fate, he effectively retracts the real insights he had gained earlier on: fate which had been seen before as a social necessity, now becomes a feeling, a sensing; it becomes the individual's experience ofthe necessity that has overtaken him. And this purely subjective experience leads on to the reconciliation with fate through love. This increased subjectivity is already indicative ofa complete distortion of reality, for the fate of an individual cannot possibly be inferred with such iron necessity from the objective determinations of society in general. In later years Hegel sees the adventitious elements in the personal fate ofan individual perfectly clearly, but here his subjective approach turns them into absolutes and thus creates a false necessity where there is none in reality. But even worse his merely subjective insight into the alleged necessity ofthis process is then invested with the dignified name ofobjectivity: the reconciliation offate through love is the path along which Hegel arrives at the mystical objectivity of his religious life.

It is not surprising, therefore, to see that fate as defmed here, i.e. not only the subjective side just discussed, but also those aspects which contain the seeds ofhis later view of society and history, soon vanishes from Hegel's philosophical vocabulary. The fruitful elements are absorbed into his theory of dialectics, but the word 'fate' is no longer used to describe them. The idea of a reconciliation through love disappears entirely, once Hegel has begun to look at social phenomena exclusively from a socio-historical standpoint, and no longer from the perspective of the individual——a process that takes place already inJena.37

Hegel's use ofthe concept of fate to give a socio-historical foundation to his philosophy of religion clearly reveals the general conflict between his system and his method. For however much he twists and turns so as to ensure that his view of fate will culminate in a would-be objective realm where fate is reconciled through love, he cannot unmake that objective dialectic of society which he had himself called into being. And viewed from that perspective the supreme religious solution that Hegel seeks looks very much like a voluntary abandonment of the struggle with the fate embodied in society, in the circumstances of history. But Hegel had clearly shown that to abandon the struggle, to flee from fate, was to invite its attentions no less surely than to take up its challenge. Evasion, then, cannot possibly represent a higher perspective. He had also shown that every evasion ofconfl.ict, every withdrawal by the subject into itself necessarily means that the false objectivity, the positivity of the social environment will survive unannulled and intact.

Now when Hegel proceeds from these highly contradictory premises to construct a picture ofJesus, the paradigmatic histoncal incarnation of the religious life, what results——leaving aside the question of Hegel's m-tentions——is not the realized image of a religious life, the overcoming of positivity through the objectless objectivity of religion, but instead a tragicfigure, who embodies the intractable nature of these contradictions. And moreover, m even more striking contrast to Hegel's intentions——an historical figure.

The introductory words ofthe draft plan formulate the historical conditions of this tragedy very clearly. Hegel's starting-point is the tense revolutionary situation in which Judaism found itself at the time ofJesus' life. We shall quote Hegel's description here in full, partly because this historical approach reveals the conflict in his intentions very clearly, and partly because we can discern in it a curious variation of that novel, more historical view ofpositivity that we have already encountered in the two political articles. What we find very clearly expressed here is the idea that an intensification of positivity is one social factor that triggers off a revolution, or more precisely, the growth of the conditions necessary for revolution makes the 'positive' features ofsociety all the more apparent.

'At the time whenJesus made his appearance among theJewish nation it found itselfin the situation which sooner or later will give rise to a revolution and which always bears the same general character. When the spirit has departed from a constitution, from the laws, and when it has changed so much that it no longer fits in with them, there comes into being a searching, a striving for something different, so that a large variety of organizations, of modes oflife, of claims and needs are created, which if they gradually diverge to the point where they can no longer subsist together, will produce an eruption and a new general form; a new bond uniting mankind will come into being. The looser this bond, the more it leaves ununified, the more it will contain the seeds of new inequalities and future explosions. '38

Hegel proceeds from this background to narrate the tragedy ofJesus:

'SinceJesus gave battle to the entire genius ofhis people and had altogether broken with his world, the completion of his fate could be nothing save suppression by the hostile gemus of his people. The glorification of the son of man in this downfall is not negative (does not consist in a renunciation of all his relations with the world) but positive (his nature has forgone the unnatural world, has preferred to save it in battle and defeat rather than* consciously submit to its corruption or else unconsciously and mcreasingly succumb to corruption's stealthy advance.) Jesus was conscious that it was necessary for his mdividual self to perish, and he tried to convince his disciples also of

this necessity.'39

Hegel still sees the tragedy of Jesus from a more or less theological point of view: the individual is sacrificed to save, to 'redeem' the corrupted world. But when he concretizes his views ofJesus still further he keeps returning to the question of his flight from the concrete forms of his environment. This leads him to say of Jesus what he used to say, though not so harshly, of subjective love: 'Thus he could discover freedom only in a void'. And now Hegel formulates the tragedy ofJesus in a very different, much more tragic form.

'The fate ofJesus was that he had to suffer from the fate of his people; either he had to make that fate his own, to bear its necessity and share its joy, to umte his spirit with his people's, but to sacrifice his own beauty, his connection with the divine, or else he had to repel his nation's fate from himself, but submit to a life undeveloped and without pleasure in itsel£ In neither event would his nature befiilfilled; in the former case he would sense only fragments of itt and even these would be sullied; in the latter, he would bring it fully into his consciousness, though he would know its shape only as a splendid shadow whose essence is the highest truth; the sensing ofthat essence he would have to forgo and the truth would not come alive in act and in reality.

Jesus chose the latter fate, the severance of his nature from the world. . . . But the more deeply he felt this severance, the less could he bear it calmly, and his actions issued from his nature's spirited reaction against the world; his fight was pure and sublime because he knew the fate in its entire range and had set himself against it ... The struggle of the pure against the impure is a sublime sight, but it soon changes into a horrible one when holiness itself is impaired by unholiness, and when an amalgamation of the two, with the pretention ofbeing pure, rages against fate, because in these circumstances holiness is caught in the fate and subject to it....

'What nas in part freed itself from fate but m part remains linked therewith, whether there be consciousness or not of this confusion, must destroy both itself and nature all the more frightfully and when nature and unnature are confused, the attack on the latter must also affect the former; the wheat is trodden underfoot with the tares, and the holiest part of nature itself is injured because it is interwoven with the unholy.'*

This tragic view of the life of Jesus betokens the collapse of Hegel's conception of the religious life whose greatest historical representative was supposed to be Jesus himsel£ It turns out that the transcendence of the mere subjectivity of love through religion, the attempt to create an objectivity without objects, simply reproduces at a higher level all the contradictions of love: the survival of the posiuvity of social determinations and, as a result of the interaction of this positivity with the subjectivism of love, an escapism which only provokes fate. And at this higher level of contradiction love becomes manifest as an insoluble tragedy. Thus Hegel's account ofJesus in no sense provides historical evidence for the view that his ideal of the religious life i> capable of realization; it is, on the contrary, much more like a philosophical version of the tragic figures ofhis friend Hölderlin, his Empedocles in particular.

Of course, there is a very essential difference between them: H<5lderlin remained true to the ideals of the French Revolution right up to his own tragic end, and not only that, he firmly placed tragedy in the very centre of his poetic enterprise. Hegel in Frankfurt, on the other hand, wished precisely to reconcile the contradictions of bourgeois society with the aid ofhis view of religion and only arrived at tragedy against his conscious intentions thanks to the contradictions between his objective and the method he employed to achieve it, and thanks also to his uncompromis-mg insistence on the method despite its unpalatable conclusions. In Hegel's thought, then, the tragic concluswn is far less conscious than for Hölderlin.

Indeed, when we move on to the Fragment ofa System, we shall see that despite the contradictions we have noted Hegel contmucs to search for a religious solution. Hence the real gains of the Frankfurt period are expressed in terms of an internal conflict, in the constant and unconscious critique of tendencies which form the conscious focus of his thought. Thus, as we have seen, insoluble antinomies inevitably persist, but since Hegel simply presses forward exploring both sides of his contradictions, and constantly acquiring new empirical material in support of them his dialectical method continues to develop in 'the manure of the contradictions'.

Among these contradictions is the emphasis that Hegel is forced to place on the societal nature of religious life as a consequence ofhis search for its objective mode. We recall that love was subjective in his eyes partly because it was a necessarily transitory relation between 'two points', between individuals. Hegel hints (c£ p. 121£) that its social maximum is the basis it provides for the family. The religwus life, however, is supposed to provide the foundation for a novel kind ofsocial relation between men (in the kingdom of God, the community, the church). The tragic contradiction which we observed in the life and historical fate ofJesus now repeats itselfin the impossibility, which is admitted to again and again, of reaching out beyond the foundation of a sect. Hegel had already observed the sectarian nature of Christianity in Berne. At that time he had criticized and rejected it from the standpoint of his preference for the city-states of antiquity. He now approaches the problem from a more sympathetic position, without its being likely that he

could overlook the social limitations of the sect.

This more positive evaluation of the exemplary social fUnction of


small communities is a general feature of the age. We may draw attention yet again to Goethe's Wilhelm Meister where such a community of


intellectually and morally outstanding mdividuals not only labour to educate each other, to develop each other's various faculties in a general


humamst sense, but also seek to further vanous social goals, m particular, the voluntary harmonious phasing-out of the vestiges of feudalism and


the transition from outmoded methods in agriculture to modern capitalist ones. (In the sequel to Wilhelm Meister's Apprenticeship, the Travels, which was planned at this time though not wntten until much later, this


same society envisages goals Utopian Socialism.) At the


which on occasion come close to the ideas of theoretical level Schiller's writings give ex


pression to many of these illusions. In the Letters on the Aesthetic Education


of Man he confronts the feudal absolutist 'natural state' with a humanist aesthetic state, and concludes his observations with the following remark:


'But docs such a state of Aesthetic semblance really exist? And if so, where is it to be found? As a need it exists in cvcrv ftnelv attuned soul; as a fact we are likely to fmd it only in a few chosen circles . . .'«

When we look a little more closely at Hegel's remarks on the social consequence ofthe moral reforms ofJesus, ofthe abolition ofthe Kantian dualism of reason and sense, duty and inclination, we cannot help bemg struck by the parallel with Goethe and Schiller. We have already noted their affinity in connection with their responses to Kant's ethical doctrine (p. 154), and we can see it again in this comment on the social implications of that cntique. Hegel says ofJesus:

'In reconcilability the law loses its form, the concept is displaced by life; but what reconcilability thereby loses in respect of the universality which grips all particulars together in the concept is only a seeming loss and a genuine infmite gain on account of the wealth of living relations with the individuals (perhaps few) with whom it comes into connection.，42

The similarity to the humanist illusions of Goethe and Schiller is so obvious as to render comment superfluous.

It is more important to discuss the differences within the general simi-lanty, smce this will throw light on what is specific to Hegel. Above all, the human and social content of these ideas is much more realistic and clear-headed in Goethe and Schiller than it is in Hegel. Both, especially Goethe, were much more liberated about religion than Hegel was m Frankfurt, and hence were able to criticize Chnstianitv much more freely.

But that is just one side of the story and we must not lose sight of the fact that it is Hegel's search for a religious philosophy that precipitates a theory which for all its obscurity and mysticism goes far beyond anything in Goethe and Schiller in its attempts to get to grips with the real problems of bourgeois society. Hegel is never content with the idea of a small group as the repository ofhumanistic ideals; he always strives for a moral code, for a theory of human conduct which would be capable of penetrating the whole of society. It is this more comprehensive ambition that leads him to the religious and mystical conclusions which we have already discussed, and in which the pervasive contradiction between method and system could be observed. But Hegel's greatness as a thinker can be seen in the way in which he resolutely faces up to the contradictions that meet him in his search for the ideal, the way he articulates them and strives constantly to discover their nature, their tendency and their underlying laws.

Precisely because of this Hegel was far in advance of Goethe and Schiller both in his understanding of bourgeois society and in his development of the dialectical method. The complex and chequered evolution of the dialectical method in Germany emerges with particular clarity from a comparison of Hegel and Goethe. Goethe is incomparably closer to materialism and much less imprisoned in religious assumptions than Hegel. Nevertheless, Hegel developed the dialectical method to a point that Goethe could not only not achieve, but one that he could not even completely understand in its perfected form (in Hegel's Logic), and this despite the fact that by nature he inclined towards dialectics and had strengthened this inclination through study.

We must not forget, therefore, that however far Hegel went astray m Frankfurt, he was throughout the period concerned to understand the problems of bourgems society in their totality and as a process. His supreme aim was reconciliation with that society, but it was a reconciliation without deceit, without an apologia, a reconciliation which depended on laying bare all the contradictions. And this understanding and exposure of the contradictions contains Hegel's fundamental humanist tendency, his humanist critique of capitalist society. His concepts, such as love, may be confused and over-idealistic, but they always contain an element of protest against the soullessness, ugliness and inhumanity of the capitalist system. If he works towards reconciliation, this means in the first instance the understanding and the recognition ofthe actual existence and ultimately the progressive nature ofcapitalism.

Hegel's bourgeois commentators have even vulgarized this aspect of his thought. From his early rejection of Kant's ethical doctrine and the fact that he increasingly treats moral problems as just moments, parts of society as a whole, they infer that he had neither seen nor acknowledged any contradictions between morality and the prevailing customs and attitudes ofbourgems society. The vulgarization lies in their failure to see that Hegel rejects Kanuan morality at least m part because its formalism illicitly and mechanically assumes a harmonious congruence between the moral code and the institutions of society. When Hegel then treats mdi-vidual morality as a moment m the totality and subordinates it to ethical life as a whole, the intention is to express the entire volatile tension between the universal and the particular. Hence his energetic critique of Kanuan formalism and of the empty, hair-splitting about morality characteristic of Romantic individualism implies anything but the failure to provide a humanistic analysis ofbourgeois morality.

This is particularly clear in the Frankfurt writings since in them Hegel proceeds from the relation ofthe individual to society. We have already seen how he treats the problem of crime. But he goes much further than this. Behind the categories oflove and religion the humanist tendency is quite clear: viz. the tendency not merely to preserve the objective nghts of society against the mdividual, but also to justify the human rights of individuals agamst society. The tragedy ofJesus springs precisely from this conflict of opposites. But we see it elsewhere also. In another part of the essay he discusses the sins of Mary Magdalene and pours scorn on her philistine judges, ending with these words:

'Would anyone say it had been better for Mary to have yielded to the fate of the Jewish life, to have passed away as an automaton of her time, righteous and ordinary, without sin and without love? Without sin, because the era of her people was one of those in which the beautiful heart could not live without sin, but in this as in anv era, could return through love to the most beautiful consciousness.，43

It is tempting to argue that the point of view exemplified here was determined by the individualism of the Frankfurt period and that it would disappear entirely with Hegel's later change towards an objectivistic, social pomt of view. But this would be to over-simplify Hegel's later theory of morality. It is not possible to discuss the matter here fully, and we must content ourselves with one illustration from the Aesthetics, making due allowances of course for changes m his method. In this passage Hegel talks about the early works of Schiller and Goethe and this in itself is mteresting since it confirms our view that Hegel's affinity is with the German classics and not, as the neo-Hegelians never tire of repeating, with the Romantics. Hegel says:

'The interest in and the need for such a real individual totalitv and living independence neither can nor will ever leave us, however reasonable and fruitful we acknowledge the character and the conditions of civil and political life to be in their developed form. In this sense we may admire the youthful poetic spirit of Goethe and Schiller in their efforts to recover the lost independence of their characters within the given conditions of the modern world.'44

The change in Hegel's attitudes, his greater objectivity vis-a-vis history and society, is expressed as an extemion of his earlier view, as the synthesizing of the complex moral problems of the individual with the Inevitable overall progress ofhistory. This results m a grandiose scheme of history, free of all moralizing and yet able to do justice to the achievement, the greatness and tragedy of man. We shall be able to sec how this scheme developed organically from the internal conflicts in Frankfurt we have discussed when we realize that it already existed in a highly advanced form in the beginnings of the penod in Jena. In one of the earliest Jena writings, the attempt to complete the essay on the German Constitution, Hegel gives portraits of both Machiavelli and Richelieu in which this genuinely historical approach is perfectly visible. And It is not just that he shows a fine humanist appreciation of particular moments in the historical process; it is one of the sources from which the correct dia-lecucal understanding of history sprang. When Engels claimed that Hegel had a profounder insight into the role of evil in history than Feuerbach himself this raised rather broader issues than the one we have been discussing, but there can be no doubt that it was one of the clements that helped to form the Hegelian view ofhistory as a whole.

NOTES

1  It is not possible for us to date this essay with absolute precision. Nohl who first published lt in toto could only deduce from the handwnting that It must have been wntten either in the winter of I 798—99 or m the summer of I 799. It is our belief that the modification in Hegel's views on the question ofthe relation of the individual to society and the positivity of property means that in all probability the essay was written after he had read Steuart, i.e. the summer of i 799. N ohl excludes a date later than the summer because Schleiermacher's Discourses on Religion appeared at the end of 1799 and Hegel makes no reference to them, even though he constantly attacked them bitterly later on. On all these questions see Nohl, p. 404f.

2  Nohl, p. 321. Knox, p. 270.

3  Nohl, p. 34if. Knox, pp. 3oo-i.

4  Nohl, p. 33. Knox, pp. 294—5.

5  Nohl,p. 336f. Knox,p. 295.

6  Nohl, p. 327f. Knox, p. 284.

7  Nohl, p. 308. Knox, p. 260. Hegel repeatedly returns to this analogy with primitive peoples, e.g. Nohl, p. 322, where he draws on

remimscences ofEnglish travellers published by Forster.

Lenin, op. cit., p. 363.

Marx, Capital, Preface to the first German edition, London 1967, p.

9

Nohl, p. 388.

Nohl, p. 276. Knox, p. 244.

Nohl, p. 390.

Nohl, p. 389.

Nohl, p. 332. Knox, p. 289.

Nohl, p. 389.

Nohl, p. 302. Knox, p. 253.

We would remind the reader that this is not a completely novel problem for Hegel. At the very start of the Frankfurt period he had attempted to reconcile love and reflection (cf. p. nSf.); the problem is now shifted onto the plane of religion.

Nohl,p. 395.

Nohl, p. 312. Knox, p. 265.

Nohl, p. 321. Knox, pp. 277—8.

Nohl, p. 389. Knox, p. 239.

Nohl, p. 290. Knox, p. 204.

Nohl, p. 313.Knox, p. 266.

Nohl, p. 309f. Knox, p. 262. The expression 'holy mystery' recurs a number of times in this manuscript in reference to the relation between the inffnite and the ffnite. Cf. Nohl, p. 304.

Nohl, p. 308. Knox, p. 259.

Nohl, p. 288. Knox, p. 238.

Nohl, p. 277. G.L. quotes in part from a deleted text omitted by Knox, p. 225.

Nohl, p. 278. Knox, p. 226.

Nohl, p. 283f. Knox, pp. 232—3.

Nohl, p. 281. Knox, pp. 23D-1.

Nohl, p. 282. Knox, p. 231.

Nohl, p. 280. Knox, pp. 228-9.

In Kleist's story Michael Kohlhaas the eponymous hero resorts to a series of increasingly spectacular and devastating crimes in order to recover some horses stolen from him by a Junker. His violent quest for justice is eventually rewarded by the recovery of his property, but he is hanged for the crimes he committed in the process——Trans.

Nohl, p. 280. Knox, p. 229.

The Philosophy ofRight, trans. T. M. Knox, Oxford 1942, p. 283.

Nohl, p. 282f. Knox, p. 232. G.L. quotes from a divergent text omitted by Knox.

The term 'fate' does of course occur in Hegel's later philosophy, but not m the meaning under discussion here. As early as the Jena Lectures of 1805/6 fate refers to a kind of necessity about which Hegel says 'we do not know what its law or its content are, or what it wants'. Realphilosophie, Vol. II, p. 186. In the same lectures the concept of fate is seen historically and as such is consigned to antiquity; ibid., p. 267. Hegel holds fast to this view in later years. Cf. the Aesthetics (ed. Glockner), Vol. II, p. ioi£ In the Logic fate is always thought of as a mechanical necessity. Cf. Werke, Berlin 1841, Vol. V. p. i87f.

38  Nohl, p. 385.                                    .,

39  Nohl, p. 317. Knox, pp. 271—2. The word 'positive' is used here in its ordinary meaning, and not in the specialized sense that it bears elsewhere in this study.

40  Nohl, p. p8f. Knox, pp. 285-6. Italics by G.L.

41  Twenty-seventh Letter, On the Aesthetic Education of Man, trans. E. M. Wilkinson andL. A. Willoughby, Oxford 1967, p. 219.

42  Nohl, p. 269. Knox, p. 215. G.L.'s italics.

43  Nohl, p. 293. Knox, p. 244.

44  Ästhetik, ed. Glockner, Vol. I, p. 266.

The Frankfurt Fragment of a System
It is not known to us whether or not the contradictions we have been discussing, or whether at least the suspicion that his system was not free of contradiction, were contributory factors in Hegel's decision to break off work on The Spirit of Christianity and to refrain from publishing what had been completed. The last part of the Frankfurt period is singularly bare of dates and other information that might be of use in enabling us to establish the further progress ofhis development. The only thing we possess is the Fragment of a System (or perhaps just draft plans for a system) which according to Hegel's own dating was completed on 14 September r8oo.i We do not know what preparatory studies preceded this fragment and so we are unable to trace in detail the steps that led to it from The Spirit of Christianity. We can only survey Hegel's philosophical position about eighteen months after the conclusion of the latter essay, a task which is facilitated by the fact that the Fragment, like The Spirit of Christianity, portrays religion as the culmination ofphilosophy; indeed this position only really receives a general philosophical statement in the later work. Our task is made more difficult, however, by the much greater dialectical sophistication of the Fragment than the previous Frankfurt writings, and this means that we are unable to follow the route by which Hegel arrived at this, the first clear formulation of the dialectical method. Here once again we are reduced to hypotheses and guess-work.

In view ofthe very fragmentary nature ofthe surviving sections ofthe essay it is obviously not possible to hazard even a guess about the appearance ofthe general structure ofHegel's philosophical system at this time, the nature of the problems on which his attentiOn was focused, and the way they were organized into a dialectical hierarchy. The only thing to emerge clearly in the first fragment is his view of the relations between religion and philosophy. All we can do, then, is to consider the specific questions raised by Hegel in the context of what we have discovered about his previous development.

In the surviving portions we rediscover the cardinal problems of the Frankfurt period: the antithesis oflife and lifeless objectivity and the resolution of this contradiction in the religious life. But although the basic theme of The Spirit of Christianity is retained and although the religious climax is even more vigorously asserted in the later work, the entire treatment shows a great advance in dialectical dexterity.

As we have seen, the transition to a dialectical approach involved relativizing ngidly one-sided concepts, shading-off their sharp distinctions from each other, the gradual merging of concepts, the dissolution of their inflexible metaphysical, 'absolute' status. Up to now this has been a general tendency ofthe Frankfurt writings, but now it seems to become a conscious method. We may remember how ngidly m Berne Hegel had contrasted living and dead, subject and object, etc. In this respect The Spirit of Christianity signifies a great step forward, for all its mysticism, and we were able to see how in certain sections, such as the treatment of Kant's ethical doctrine, the tendency to dissolve these rigid opposites gradually became a conscious process. In the Fragment Hegel now takes a further conscious step forward in the direction of making his concepts more flexible, m discovermg the fluidity ofthe process ofknowledge.

The first fragment ofthe manuscript starts and ends in the middle of a sentence. Its subject is the problem oflife, ofthe relation ofthe individual to his environment. Hegel views this relationship as one between two totalities. The picture he gives of the external world is much more clearly that ofan organic whole with its own laws than in his earlier writings. It is true that Hegel's ideal of life reborn had always implied the possibility and necessity of such a view, but hitherto the entire problem had been penpheral. In particular, his detailed analysis shows that by the 'external world' ofman it was chiefly the problems ofman in society that concerned him most deeply. Nature is indeed always on the horizon, but it is always closely bound up with life in society; in fact it always appears m association with the question of whether a particular form of society lives in harmony with nature, or estranged from it and hostile to it.

Up to now Hegel had made no attempt to study the philosophy of nature any more than he had tried to treat epistemological problems independently of concrete social or historical issues. But whereas we have seen how the emergence of contradictions in the study of history and society led Hegel to profound methodological studies and to the development ofthe dialectical method, the available material does not suggest that he was similarly impelled to study the problems of the philosophy ofnature. It is indeed the case that Hegel studied Schelling's writings much more attentively m Frankfurt than he had done in Berne; this is evident from a whole series ofterms taken over from Schelling. However, these writings could not possibly have given Hegel any real knowledge of scientific problems. And in Jena we shall see him throw himselfinto the study of the philosophy of nature and become heavily involved in particular scientific questions. In Jena he became very friendly with a number ofscientists. In 1804 he became a member of the Mineralogical Society and in the same year he also joined the Westphalian Society for Scientific Research.2 From the Frankfurt period we do indeed possess a quantity of notes on geometry but Hegel himself has dated these 23 September i 8oo, i.e. after he had finished writmg the Fragment.3

The Fragment treats the problems of philosophy ofnature quite differently from anything that Hegel had done hitherto. How far his ideas go is very difficult to decide from the surviving passages. Nevertheless, the mere fact ofsuch a discussion is ofsome interest, especially as it occurs repeatedly in these few pages. At the beginmng of the second passage we find an admittedly highly obscure and mystical discussion of time and space which is really almost beyond comprehension, particularly since it represents the final conclusions of an argument now lost. We believe, however, that in view of the extreme rapidity with which Hegel immersed himselfin scientific problems mJena, we would not be unduly rash m assummg that the preparatory studies for the Fragment must have included a certam amount ofwork on scientific matters.

In the first of the two fragments life appears as the relation of one tota}-ity to another. (One is reminded here of Hegel's later definition of the dialectical structure of any real totality as a circle that consists entirely of other circles.) Both the world and the individual are 'infinite multiplicities' ofwhich one, the individual,

'is to be regarded purely as something related, as having its being purely in union,——the second (also an infinite multiplicity) is to be regarded as solely in opposition, as having its being solely through a separation from the first. ... The first part is called an organization, an individual.'4

At first glance this looks like a subjectivization of the relation between the individual and objective reality, and we must not forget that the idealist in Hegel certainly has a tendency towards this, since it is the original assumption or act of'positing' (Setzung) that determines what is to be regarded as a union and what as a separation. We should not overlook the fact, however, that it represents at the same time a relativization of what had been a rigid antithesis of individual and objective reality, and it brings a much more vital, mobile, fluid interaction into being, a process described by Hegel in these words:

'The concept of individuality includes opposition to infinite variety and also inner association with it. A human being is an individual life in so far as he is to be distmguished from all the elements and from the infinity of individual beings outside himself. But he is only an individual life in so far as he is at one with all the elements, with the infinity of lives outside himsel£ He exists only inasmuch as totality of life is divided into parts, he himself being one part and all the rest the other part; and again he exists only inasmuch as he is no part at all and inasmuch as nothing is separated from him.'5

Thus the relativization of the antithesis between individual and the world resulting from this assumption does not only imply that each living bemg can be thought ofbotn as such a centre—relatively speaking ——-ofthe union, and merely as a part of a whole, i.e. as the external world ofanother individual, but also that each individual appears as a unit and the foundation on which it is built is the simultaneous existence ofboth a unification with and a separation from the world around it.

This relationship can be regarded in two different ways according to Hegel. (i) One may choose the 'undivided life' (i.e. the religious life from The Spirit of Christianity) as a starting-point. In that case every individual is only 'an expression oflife', and all such expressions are 'crystallized by reflection ... into stable, subsistent, and fixed points, i.e. into mdividuals. '6 Hence reflection is assigned the important, even decisive role of crystallizng the isolated phenomena into individuals. On the other hand, reflection appears as something merely subjective, since life is of itself undivided and reflection imports individuation into it through its own act ofpositing. Here we see the ambivalent, as yet insoluble paradox ofreflection in Hegel's early thought at its most extreme. The other solution open to him of an objective reflection is the product of a later, more mature development.

(2) This unresolved duality becomes even more apparent when Hegel comes to speak ofthe converse assumption. Here 'we presuppose individual lives, namely ourselves, the spectators.' This gives rise to the antithesis ofego and nature,

'as a multiplicity, it is an infinite multiplicity oforganizations or individuals, and as a unity it is one unique organized whole, divided and unified m itself.'

This is an admirable and correct definition, which suffers however 'only' from the fundamental idealist defect that it is an assumption, an assumption made moreover from the standpoint of the observer. It is not life itself, but merely

'a positing of life, for reflection has applied to life its concepts of relation and separation, of the self-subsistent particular (something restricted) and the unifying universal (something unrestricted), and by positing these has turned life into nature. '7

Here, then, nature is manifestly the product ofthe positing ego and ofthe ego as reflection in particular.

This duality now determines Hegel's view of the relation between philosophy and religion. To put it briefly, if what we are considering is the two manifest forms oflife, then the first corresponds to religion, the second to spirit and law. According to Hegel the law is

'but a bare unity, something purely conceptual and not a living being. . . . Spirit is an animatmg law in union with the manifold which is then itselfanimated.'

For this reason man must advance beyond the positing of the ego and nature m order to arrive at real life in a living relationship. For since

'nature is not life itself, but is only a life crystalhzed by reflection, even though it be treated by reflection in the worthiest manner, therefore life, m thinking and in contemplating nature still senses . . . this contradiction. . . . And out of the mortal and perishable figure, out of what is self-opposed and self-antagonistic, this thinking life raises that living being, which would be free from transience; raises a relation between the manifold elements which is not dead or killing, a relation which is not a [bare] unity, a conceptual abstraction, but is all-living and all-powerful infinite life; and this life it calls God. In this process it is no longer [merely] thinking or contemplating, because its object does not carry in itself anything reflected, anything dead.'^

It is evident that through this philosophical formulation of his chief theme m Frankfurt, the theme of that livmg life that annuls all that is dead, positive, objective and reflected, Hegel has arrived at an authentic mystical position. Hence his view of the relation between philosophy and religion is, logically enough, that philosophy is superseded by religion. Philosophy as philosophy can only lead to a Kantian 'infinite progress^ (Hegel was later to term it a 'bad infinity*). According to Hegel's views at this stage, an infinite progress cannot be brought to any conclusion within philosophy. Such a conclusion would imply going beyond the infinite progress, the 'bad infinity' which must contmually posit the lifeless and positive as lifeless and positive, and this is only possible by reaching a form of reality beyond reflection. Hegel describes what this mvolves in the following way:

'Every expression whatsoever is a product of reflection, and therefore it is possible to demonstrate in the case of every expression that, when reflection propounds it, another expression, not propounded, is excluded. Reflection is thus driven on and on without rest; but this process must be checked once and for all by keeping in mind that, for example, what was earlier called a union of synthesis and antithesis [the argument referred to here has not survived in the extant fragment, G.L.J is not something propounded by the understanding or by reflection but has a character of its own, namely, that ofbeing a reality beyond all reflection. . . . Philosophy therefore has to stop short of religion because it is a process of thinking and, as such a process, implies an opposition with non-thinking [processes] as well as the opposition between the thinking mind and the object of thought. Philosophy has to disclose the finiteness m all finite things and reqmre their integration by means of reason. In particular, it has to recognize the illusions generated by its own inffnite and thus to place the true infmite outside its conffnes.'10

The task of philosophy then, is its own self-annulment in favour of religion.

This 'reality beyond all reflection' is the realm of religwn. In Hegel,s view it cannot be a thought-out, reasoned relation of man to the world, but something lived. In the course of a polemic against contemporary philosophy Hegel emphasizes that the elevation of man in religion does not proceed

'from the finite to the infmite (for these terms are only products of mere reflection, and as such their separation is absolute), but from finite life to infinite life.'11

In this infinite life the separate partial existence ofthe parts, i.e. including human beings, ceases to be.

Fimte life r； ises itself to infnite life. It is onlv because the ffnite is

possibility of raising itself to infrmte


itselflife that it carries in itselfthe life.w

Hegel goes on to explan how the process ofthe self-elevation from ffnite life to infnite life should proceed.

'When man . . . takes the infnite life as the spirit of the whole, and at the same time as a living being outside himself (since he himself is restricted), and when he puts himself at the same time outside his restnc-ted self in nsing toward the living being and intimately uniting himself with him, then he worships God.，,3

In our discussion of the manuscnpt of The Spirit oj Christianity we dealt very fully with the question ofthe social issues that impelled Hegel in the direction of the religious life. Now, when faced with the extreme mystical formulations of his concluding piece of work in Frankfurt we must briefly turn to the philosophical problems that determine their particular shape. These statements, like Schelling's almost exactly contemporary System of Transcendental Idealism, mark the point at which classical German philosophy takes the road towards objective, absolute idealism.

The transition from subjective to objective idealism raises the question of philosophical attitudes towards reality, towards existence indepen-dentlv of consciousness. For this reason it also involves an attitude (whether open or covert) to philosophical materialism. Kant's subjective idealism had really hesitated, as Lenin observes, between idealism and materialism; it compromised between the two.

'When Kant assumes that something outside us, a thing-in-itself corresponds to our ideas, he is a materialist. When he declares this thing-m-itself to be unknowable, transcendental, beyond this world, he is an idealist.，14

As is well known, Fichte rejected this compromise in the "/ 'heory of Science in favour of a radical and logically coherent subjective idealism. Both Hegel and Schellmg then strove to advance beyond both Kant and Fichte in a quest for a solutwn to the problems of philosophy that tended towards objective idealism. And since it is a widely-held belief among historians of philosophy that Hegel was in a certain sense the disciple, and that he extended lines of thought developed by Schelling, we must at once devote a little space to their relations with each other (though we must postpone our detailed comparison of Schelling and Hegel for later chapters when we shall be able to examme their collaboration in Jena and Hegel's cntique of the Schellmgian version of dialectics).

In brief we may say at this point that Hegel's first attempt to formulate an objective idealism owes nothing to the influence of Schellmg, but grows organically from the contradictions arismg from his own reflections on socio-historical problems. Of course, there can be even less truth m the suggestion that Hegel might have exerted an influence on Schelling. The latter's objective idealism grew from his own desire to supplement Fichte's philosophy with a philosophy of nature. It took Schelling a relatively long time before he became fully aware of the gulf between Fichte's dialectics and his own, and in all probability Hegel did have something to do with hastening his realization of this fact. But in general it may be said that at first sight the paths of the two leading representatives of objective idealism in Germany ran parallel with each other.

But even this parallelism is more apparent than real and we should not be led astray by the two thinkers themselves who believed for a number of years that their philosophical ideas were intimately related. In reality they were proceeding in opposite directions and their collaboration m Jena was the meeting-place of paths that diverged both and after. That they comcided at this point was due to the need felt by both to join forces in a common battle against subjective idealism and this need was able to override differences which in any case had not yet become fully apparent.

To explam the problem schematically, objective idealism has two general methods for coming to grips with objective reality (both of which are in fact pseudo-solutions, even though the differences between the two types are of importance). The first approach can be seen in Hegel's Frankfurt writings. As with Kant and Fichte, empirical reality is thought of as something 'posited' by the philosophical subject. Beyond that there ts a further 'non-posited' reality which is the authentic reality independent of human consciousness. This latter is in fact a religious reality whose extreme idealistic nature is expressed in the notion that it is supposed to be the lived union of the subjective and objective principles, the dissolution of the opposition between man and the world in the union of man and God. We thus ffmd ourselves in a pseudo-mystical realm which is either entirely empty——a mght in which all cows are black, as Hegel was later to observe m the Phenomenology— r an irrationalist receptacle in which all sorts of reactionary contents may be deposited at will. The most important manifestation of this type of idealism is Schelling's later, so-called 'positive' philosophy (designed to complement the 'negative' philosophy ofhis youth). Here Schelling was the predecessor of a whole senes oflater reactionary philosophies from Kierkegaard to Heidegger. (On Schelling's later thought cf. Chapter II of my book The Destruction ofReason, Berlin 1950, Werke, Vol. 9, 1962.)

The second type of objective idealism to be found m Hegel's mature philosophy and its programme, proclaimed in The Phenomenology of Mind, states that the task of philosophy is to transform all substance into subject, i.e. that the whole world is to be deptcted as the self-production and self-recognition of spirit and every objective reality is just one of the various possible forms of spirit m a state of 'externalization'. This means, of course, that all the relations between subjectivity and objectivtty are turned upside down and are distorted in detail, as we shall see clearly when we come to discuss Marx's critique of the Phenomenology. All we need say at this point, however, is that for all its idealist distortion, this was the only form of objective idealism capable of yieldmg a dialectic of human progress, a progressive view of the laws underlying nature and society; the only form of objective idealism capable ofbemg turned right way up again and converted into a materialism. The other version of objective idealism is necessarily reactionary.

To put the matter schematically, and anticipating our own detailed analysis, we may say that Hegel's development begins with the reactionary form of objective idealism and advances to its progressive form, whereas Schelling proceeds in the reverse direction. We shall see how Schellmg begins quite naively with an attempt to build a philosophy of nature into Fichte 's theory of knowledge and that these first essays in natural philosophy reveal far-reaching matenalist leanings such as Hegel never experienced. But because he was unable ever to reach the same level of dialectical thought as Hegel and became too of his much more superficial knowledge of the problems of society and history, he was gradually driven to adopt the sort of solution that Hegel arrived at during the crisis ofhis thought in Frankfurt.

The contradictions arising from this crisisleave their marks also on the few fragments remaining from his plan for a system. In the first place it is interesting to note that even when Hegel follows his extremist, irrationalist and mystical tendencies right through to their concluswns he never entirely loses his ordinary sense of reality and would prefer his mysticism to be disfigured by the most blatant contradictions rather than fall victim to an out-and-out irrationalism. Thus we have seen how the whole point of this Fragment is to show how religion annuls and transcends philosophy. We have also seen that this act of supersession involves abandoning the realm of thought, of reflection. But at the same time it is interesting to observe that just at the pomt where he seeks to define the worship of God beyond all thought (see the quotation on p. 214) he unconsciously re-introduces his philosophical categories into the worship of God, thus destroying the entire edifice of religious irrationalism. For at this point he remarks that man 'takes', 'posits' both the infinite life and himself within religion as something 'outside himself', i.e. he implies that the religious life is likewise the product of the philosophical activity of the subject and——to use the terminology of the Phenomenology——is in a certain sense no more than one ofthe 'configurations ofconsciousness'.

The second contradiction between system and method is even more important and influential. We have seen that Hegel only allows philosophy a negative, preparatory role as the hand-maiden ofreligion, a role in which philosophy as it were prepares the way for its own critical selfabolition. In explaining the necessity for this he argues that the most philosophy can achieve is the 'infinite progress' of Kant and Fichte, or what he will later call a 'bad infinity'. In harmony with this is the fact that Hegel here simply equates philosophy with what in Jena he will call 'the philosophy of reflection'. (It is very revealing that this equation should be found again in Schelling's later 'positive' philosophy, but there it is used as a weapon with which to attack Hegel.)

But without noticing it or drawing any conclusions from it Hegel has nevertheless gone beyond this point of view here. A number of isolated remarks show that he has already anticipated his later definition of dialectics, even ifonly in an obscure and confused manner. But in the course ofhis argument showing that philosophy is incapable of really annulling opposition and is therefore compelled to annul itselfand to allow itself to be absorbed into religion he arrives at a relatively clear statement of his later dialectical method.

'Although the manifold is here no longer regarded as isolated but is rather explicitly conceived as related to the living spirit, as animated, as organ, still something remains excluded, namely, the dead, so that a certain imperfection and opposition persists. In other words, when the manifold is conceived as an organ only, opposition itselfis excluded; but life cannot be regarded as union or relation alone but must be regarded as opposition as well. Ifl say that life is the union of opposition and relation, this umon may be isolated again, and it may be argued that union is opposed to non-union. Consequently, I would have to say: Life is the union of union and non-union. * 15

It is evident that this statement incorporates the mature form of Hegel's dialectic; it embodies the view of contradiction which raises Hegel above all his predecessors because of its realizauon that contradiction is the profoundest principle of all things and their movements, whereas they are all content with the simple resolution ofantithetical determinations and so inevitably drift towards a realm (always more or less religious) where all contradictions are extinguished. (And of this Schelling ts a cardinal instance.) With Hegel's formulation, however, contradictoriness appears as the living and moving principle. It simply cannot be abolished for good and all but continually reproduces itself at a higher level. (When we come to examine Hegel's development inJena we shall see that this implies a radical change in the status of reflection since reflection now becomes a necessary moment in the overall dialectical movement. But at the moment it is necessary to point out only that sporadic elements of this view were always present in Hegel's thought in Frankfurt, even though they were never fully thought out at this stage.) It is no less clear that this view of dialectics, if thought through, would inevitably explode the idea that the religious life could be the culminating moment of philosophy. Hence when Hegel does follow up his conception of dialectics his analysis leads him directly to the form of speculation', characteristic ofhis mature philosophy.

This doctrine of contradiction can only be worked out adequately and consistently within a materialist dialectic in which it can be regarded as the intellectual mirroring ofthe dynamic contradictions ofobjective reality. But this insight into the necessary limitation of Hegel's philosophical idealism does not in the least diminish his great achievement in perceiving the real character ofcontradiction in both life and thought. In this context Lenin has emphasized the importance of the much clearer and more accurate statements in the Logic and has shown how the path leads from them to the materialist 'inversion' of the Hegelian dialectics. He cites a number of passages from the Logic, among them the place where Hegel discusses the relation between identity and contradiction:

'But indeed, ifthere were any question of rank, and the two determinations had to be fixed as separate, contradiction would have to be taken as the more profound and the more fully essential.'

Lenin side-lined this passage approvingly and remarked at the end of the whole excerpt:

'Movement and "self-movement" (this NB! arbitrary [independent],

THE FRANKFURT FRAGMENT OF A SYSTEM 219 spontaneous, internally-necessary movement), "change", "movement and vitality", "the principal of all self-movement", "impulse", [Trieb] to "movement" and to "activity"——the opposite to "dead Being"——who would believe that this is the core of"Hegelianism", of abstract and abstruse (ponderous, absurd?) Hegelianism?? This core had to be discovered, understood, “hinUbergerettet" [rescued], laid bare, refined, which is precisely what Marx and Engels did.'16

This formulation of dialectical contradiction is the greatest achievement of Hegel's period in Frankfurt. We might say that it brings his phase of philosophical 'Sturm und Drang', the period of intellectual crisis, to a conclusion. But we have also established that this same formulation stands in the most glaring contradiction to the positions ffnally adopted in Frankfurt, to the structure of the Fragment of a System as a whole. We can do no more than pomt to this contradiction, without being able to show in detail how Hegel arrived at it. For that we would need the preparatory studies in Frankfurt, the missing sections of the Fragment itsel£ together with the other studies carried out by Hegel just before he left forJena. The importance of this lost matenal can be gauged from the remark he let fall to the effect that he had already talked about the 'union of synthesis and antithesis'. Since neither Fichte nor Schelling had gone further than the idea of synthesis as the umon of thesis and antithesis we may assume that we have lost an important statement about Hegel's view ofhis innovations in dialectics.

In our analysis of the general tendencies found in Hegel dunng the Frankfurt period, we have attempted to show the factors in his thought that led to an intensified antagonism between his system and his method. In the context of our earlier discussions we now believe that we are justified in airing the hypothesis that one ofthe decisive moments that helped to determine his view of contradictoriness was the dynamic contradiction to be found most strikingly m human activity, in work. In an earlier chapter (p. 174—sff.) we suggested that a plausible case might be made to show that Hegel was already familiar with Adam Smith's writings on economics and had taken over his concept of work at the time when he was writing the Fragment of a System. If we now look at what Hegel wrote a few years later about the economic problems connected with work we can see that what is essential to them is that concepts such as the particular and general, which are mutually exclusive in metaphysical thought, not only merge into each other, but that they always appear simultaneously and inseparable from each other, united in contradiction ——and that in Hegel's eyes this is their salient characteristic. We may look, for example, at what he says in the System of Ethics Qena r8oz) about tools and their relation to man and his work:

'On the one hand, they are subjective, in the power of the subject who works, and quite definitely prepared and operated by him; and on the other hand, they are objecuvely directed towards the object of work. Tools are thus a means through which the subject annuls the immediacy of annihilation; for work as an annihilation of intuition is equally an annihilation of the subject, a negation, positing him as a mere quantity; both hands and mind are blunted by it, i.e. they themselves assume the nature of the negative and formless, just as on the other side (for the negative, the difference is doubled) work is simply single and subjective. Through tools the subject creates a middle thing between itself and the object and this medium is the real rationality of work. . . . Through tools the subject divests himself of his objectivity and ceases to be blunted . . . at the same time his work ceases to be something single; through tools the subjectivity of work is raised to the level of the universal; anyone can imitate it and work in the same fashion; to that extent it is the constant rule of work.，17

Wc are not concerned here to offer a critique of Hegel's economic views, but only with his methodology. And here the reader can see that Hegel's novel interpretation of dialectics is particularly well-developed when the subject under discussion is work, activity. Not only do we find the merging of the general in the particular and vice versa, but also we see that Hegel views the activity of work, man's active relation to the world of objects mediated by tools, simultaneously as something general and particular. Obviously, the evidence of such passages even though they were written only a few years later cannot provide any conclusive proof that his reflections on the contradictions in the notion of work provided one of the chief sources for the specifically Hegelian form of dialectics. But since the mainstream of his development does flow towards the Phenomenology whose central idea is the self-production of man through his own activity and since we have already observed such views in embryonic form at an earlier stage of his thought, we think it legitimate to use this passage as the basis for an hypothesis by which to explain a stage in his development for which no incontestable evidence is available.

The second surviving passage from The Fragment of a System forms the conclusion of the essay and focuses on those discussions of property, work and sacrifice which we have already examined in some detail in connection with the growth of Hegel's views on economics. They form a part of that complex of ideas familiar to us from our analysis of The Spirit of Christianity and centring on the question of whether religion is adequate to the task to which it has been appointed, according to Hegel, of overcoming the false, lifeless, 'positive' objectivity of the world. The answer we discover here sounds rather more sceptical than one was entitled to expect after the enthusiastic mystical outpourings of the fragment already discussed. Hegel refers here to discussions——now lost ——according to which the religious life was dcffncd as something which kept objects alive or breathed new life into them, views known to us from earlier chapters. Nor is there anything fundamentally new in his reference to the fate of the religious life

'which demands ofhim that he admit the existence of the objecuve as objective or even that he make the living being itself mto an object.'

The later formula is even more mcisive than those in The Spirit of Christianity, for there, although Hegel went no further than to acknowledge that religion could not annul objectivity, it was only Judaism which was accused of causmg livmg relauons with objectivity to ossify. This process of objectification may well be momentary and revocable.

'But it is necessary that life should also put itself into a permant relation with objects and thus maintain their objectivity even to the point of completely destroying them.'

Here once again the Hegelian definition of work as a permanent relation, not capable of being annulled by religion, comes to the surface. The process of realizing religion in the modern world is seen by Hegel to be one in which the religious life must continually come to terms with the conditions oflife which have become objective and constantly reproduce objectivity. This goes so far that Hegel even admits that for modern priests the social division oflabour is unavoidable.18

We can see, then, that Hegel's extravagant hopes about the redemptive power of religion fade in proportion as he approaches the concrete history and social reality of the modern world. In line with this the concluding sentences of the Fragment have a certain air of resignation. Hegel believes that

'an elevation of finite life to infinite life such that as little as possible of the ffnite and restricted . . . remains . . . is not absolutely necessary. Religion is any elevation of the ffnite to the infimte . . . and some such elevation is necessary. . . . But the stage of opposition and unification on which the determinate nature of one generation of men persists is accidental. The most perfect integration is ossible in the case of peoples whose life is separated and disintegrate as little as possible, i.e. in the case of happy peoples. Unhappy peoples cannot reach that stage, but they, living in a state of separation, must take anxious care for the preservation of one member [of the whole], i.e. for their own independence.'捋

We can see that the intoxicating wine of religious mystiosm has been watered down considerably by this point.

Of philosophical importance in these and the sentences directly following them is Hegel's attempt to take up a cntical stance towards the Sosophies of his age (which he has now seen to be necessary) and to

;e them from a loftier perspective. It comes as no surprise to see him equating pure objectivity and pure subjectivity in the course of his strictures on the limitations of the finite life and on fragmentation. For this is no more than a general philosophical re-statement of the idea already familiar to us according to which activity and passivity, struggle against fate or flight from it, amount to the same thing.

But his arguments, which are evidently aimed at Kant and Fichtc, go beyond this. It occurs to him for the fmt time that the subjectivity of Kant and Fichte is part of the same complex as the unknowable thing-m-itself. He wntes:

'One may consider this situation from the side of subjectivity as independence, or from the other side as an alien, remote, inaccessible object. Both seem to be compatible with one another, although it is necessary that, the stronger the separation is, the purer must the Ego be and the further must the object be removed from and above man. The greater and more isolated the inner sphere, the greater and more isolated is the outer sphere also . . . it does not matter what mode of consciousness a man prefers. . . . When the separation is infinite, it does not matter which remains fixed, the subject or the object, but in either case the opposition persists, the opposition of the absolutely finite to the absolutely infinite. '7l

Thus Hegel is no longer content to criticize the philosophy of Kant and Fichte purely from a moral point of view: this critique is directed at their system in its entirety and hints that its epistemological foundations, viz. the unknowable thing-in-itself, are the philosophical correlative of their subjectivity. On the other hand, he regards their philosophy as the most important world-view of the age since it expresses its intractable contradictonness, a condition that he will term 'disintegration' [ Zerrissenheit] in Jena. Thus Hegel sees Kant and Fichte as the representatives of the cnsis which he perceives in the social situation of the age. To discover a philosophical cure for this crisis is the task he has proposed to himsel£

We know already what this. cure appeared to him to be in Frankfurt. We have also seen the internal contradictions it contained. The historical and epistemological evaluation of Kant and Fichte remains a constant in his later philosophy. The process of overcoming the religious mysticism of his Frankfurt period will enable him to place this critique of them in a more comprehensive, more scientific framework. That is to say, the elements of his later historical method are already present. In this he does not criticize particular aspects or doctrines of these philosophers, but instead sees them as philosophical totalities which are at the same time the humane'——this is Hegel'sjudgment on their Weltanschauung and it points at the same time to the general humanist philosophy by which he hoped to overcome it.

NOTES

1  What remains of this manuscript are two wntten sheets each filling three printed sides in the Nohl edition. According to Hegel's own pagination the manuscript seems to have contained 47 such sheets. What has survived are pp. 8 and 47 (Nohl, p. 345). It is doubtful whether Hegel regarded the work as finished. In a later letter to Schelling dated 2 November 1 8oo he speaks of his work on the system as if it were still going on. But we cannot say whether this remark refers to the present fragment or to the ininal stages of some other work (c£ Rosenkranz, p. 143). No preparatory studies for this or any other works from the same period have come to light. We shall have something to say about the new introduction to The Positivity of Christianity in the next chapter. Hoffmeister maintains that an examination of the manuscripts shows that the brief essay on Schiller's Wallenstein also (alls within this period, although it has always been included in Hegel's later Berlin wntmgs (Vol. XX of the Glockner ediuon, pp. 456ffL) cf. Hoffmeister, p. 456£ Since this essay merely presents a number of variations on the view of fate already familiar to us we do not intend to comment on it further.

2  Cf. Rosenkranz, p. 220 for an account of these activities and relations inJena.

3  Hoffmeister, pp. 288ff. and 47off.

4  Nohl, p. 346. Knox, p. 309.

5  Nohl, p. 346. Knox, p. 310.

6  Ibid.

7  Nohl, p. 346f. Knox, p. 310.

8  Nohl, p. 347. Knox, pp. 3 1D-11.

9  Hegel's mature discussion of Kant's 'mfinite progress' can be found m the Science of Logic (trans. Miller, London 1969, pp. 15D-54 and 227—34). He remarks there: 'The spurious infinite, especially in the form of the quantitative progress to infinity which continually surmounts the limit it is powerless to remove, and perpetually falls back into it, is commonly held to be something sublime and a kind of divine worship, while in philosophy it has been regarded as ultimate. This progression has often been the theme of tirades which have been admired as sublime productions. As a matter of fact, however, this modern sublimity does not magnify the object—rather does this take flight——but only the subject which assimilates such vast quantities.' He goes on to criticize the 'hollowness of this exaltation' as he finds it in the 'tirade' at the end of the Critique oj Practical Reason thought above the place he occupies in the world of sense, reaching out to infinity, to stars beyond stars, worlds beyond worlds, systems beyond systems' etc. Hegel goes on to castigate the love ofinfinity as displayed by modern astronomers and finally attacks its role in Kant's moral dualism: 'To the infmity of outer, sensuous intuition,, Kant opposes the other infinite, when "the individual withdraws into his invisible ego and opposes the absolute freedom ofhis will as a pure ego to all the terrors offate and tyranny, and starting with his immediate surroundings, lets them vanish before him, and even what seems enduring, worlds upon worlds, collapse into ruins, and, alone knows himself as equal to himself."' Hegel comments: 'The ego in being thus alone with itselfis, it is true, the reached beyond; it has come to itself, is with itself, here and now; the absolute negativity which in the progress beyond the quantum of sense was only a fl.ight, in pure self-consciousness becomes affirmative and present. But this pure ego, because it has fixed itself in its abstraction and emptiness, has determinate reality, the fulness of the universe of nature and mind, confronting it as a beyond. We are faced with the same contradiction which lies at the base of the infmite progress, namely a returnedness-into-sel£ which is at the same time immediately an out-of-selfness, a relation to Its other as to its non-being; and this relation remains a longing, because on the one side is the insubstantial, untenable void ofthe ego fixed as such by the ego itself, and on the other, the fullness which though negated remains present, but is fixed by the ego as its beyond.' Thus Hegel's critique of 'infinite progress is crucial to his rebuttal of the philosophy of Kant and Fichte, just as his concept of'bad or spurious infinity' is pivotal to his attack on Romantic Irony. Cf. his remarks on the Ought where similar arguments are employed (Science of Logic, op. cit., pp.

I 3 I-6)—J rans.

10  Nohl, p. 348. Knox, pp. 312—1 3. G.L.'s italics.

11  Nohl, p. 347. Knox, p. 311.

12  Nohl, p. 348. Knox, p. 313.

I 3 Nohl, p. 347. Knox, p. 312.

14  Lenin, Materialism and Empirio-Criticism, Collected Works, Vol. 14, London 1962, p. 198.

15  Nohl, p. 347f. Knox, p. 3 12. G.L.'s italics.

16  Lenin, Collected Works, vol. 38,pp. 139 and 141.

17  Lasson, p. 428.

I 8 Nohl, p. 349f. Knox, p. 3 i6f.

19  Nohl, p. 350. Knox, p. 317.

20  Nohl, p. 351. Knox, pp. 3 17—18.

CHAPTER EIGHT

Reformulation of the problem of'positivity'
The last piece of work undertaken by Hegel in Frankfurt was a new introduction to the great Berne manuscript The Positivity of the Christian Religion. Hegel himself gives 24 September 1800 as the date when he started work on 1t, i.e. shortly after finishing The Fragment of a System, and since the essay is brief no further chronological problems are involved. Hegel's general approach to the problem here is radically opposed to that ofthe original study; it is not known, however, whether he seriously intended to rewrite it or not; nor do we know when he stopped working on it.

The analysis of the new introduction presents no special problems in view of our familiarity with Hegel's other Frankfurt writings since in the main it summarizes ideas which we have frequently encountered. We shall concentrate, therefore, on those features which come closer to his later views as well as those which pmnt up the change from earlier positions and in particular his rejection of ideas he had entertained in Berne.

A point of particular methodological interest is his definiuon of an 'ideal' since it represents the as yet unclear formulation of what he was later to call the 'concrete concept'. Both in Berne and Frankfurt the word 'ideal' recurs often enough but it is used either in its ordinary meaning or in its Kantian sense. The term is not particularly well adapted to what Hegel wants it to mean and he soon dropped it, but the substance is ofthe first importance. After the new conception of dialectical contradiction in the Fragment of a System it comes as no surprise to see Hegel moving in the direction of the concrete concept. However, our thesis that his method and system were m conflict during the Frankfurt period and that his development of the dialectic worked against his systematic aims, is confirmed by the fact that he now looks for and finds the concrete totality within the categories of philosophy, even though in the Fragment the concrete had been placed in the realm of the religious and philosophy had been assigned the lesser role of preparing the way for religion through its negative criticism; which task accomplished, it would

e>       e> . .R                         r，

find itself superseded by it.

Here Hegel contrasts the ideal 灿 ich is concrete and historical, with universal concepts which are abstract and anti-historical. He writes:

'An ideal ofhuman nature, however, is quite different from general concepts of man's vocation or of man's relation to God. The ideal does permit of particularization, of determination in detail, and therefore it demands appropriate religious actions, feelings, usages, demands an excess of these, a mass of excessiveness which in the lamplight of general concepts seems only ice and stone. '1

This statement certainly lacks methodological rigour and precision, but it represents the first appearance ofHegel's discovery that generalization does not necessarily entail the impoverishment of content (as formal logic assumes), but that, on the contrary, because true philosophical generalizations contain rich deposits of material that has been superseded they become richer and more concrete the higher the level of generalization becomes.

Hegel's reliance in Frankfurt on experience as a basis for the formation of conceptual schemes is demonstrated here by the way in which necessary generalizations have not yet been fully emancipated from the actual historical occasion that engendered them. Instead they simply carry the signs of their origin along with them in an undigested or only partly digested form. In the present instance, the 'ideal', the general concept by means of which Hegel is moving towards the concrete concept, has still not freed itselffrom the realm of religious positivity to which it is being applied. Of course, the later Hegel, too, always enlivens and illuminates the most abstract ideas with a mass of concrete material, but there is a great difference between that and the confused, unmediated union, which we see here, between the problem itself and the factors that brought it into existence.

Like all of Hegel's developmental processes this one too has a dual character. On the one hand, as we have shown, it contains the seeds of a new logic which make it possible to accommodate the particularity of objects and ofhistorical phenomena within dialectics and so to construct a methodology which—— ven though unconscious at this stage and full of idealist distortions——is capable of reflecting the richness and mobility of objective reality. On the other hand, Hegel employs this more concrete logical structure in order to defend religion against the encroachments of reason and the understanding.

In line with this the opening remarks of the new introduction contain a full-scale attack on the philosophy of the Enlightenment and its view of history and religion in particular. From the outset Hegel protests energetically against the distinction drawn by the Enlightenment between positive and natural religion. He rejects the premise

'that there is only one natural religion, smce human nature is one and single, while there may be many positive religions. '2

Hegel rejects the idea that religion and its historical role can be

THE PROBLEM OF ‘POSITIVITY’ deduced from such generalized concepts ofhuman nature.

'The general concept of human nature is no longer adequate. The [concept of the] freedom of the will is a one-sided standard, because human manners and characteristics together with the accompanying religion cannot be determined by concepts at all. . . . The universal concepts of human nature are too empty to afford a criterion for the special and necessarily manifold needs of religious feelings.，3

Hegel's aim here——and this is the progressive side ofhis method——is to refrain from passing moral and philosophical judgment on the past, and to limit himself to attempting to comprehend its dynamics and complexity. After listing a series of arguments agamst religion advanced by the Enlightenment, he adds:

'But this method of explaimng the matter presupposes a deep contempt for man and the presence of glaring superstition in his intellect. . . . The sole question raised . . . is the question about the truth of religion in abstraction from the manners and characteristics of the nations and epochs which believed it, and the answer to this question is that religion is empty superstition, deception and stupidity.，4

Hegel raises a passionate protest against the notion that

'the convictions of many centuries, regarded as sacrosanct, true and obligatory by the millions who lived and died by them in those centuries, were . . . at least on their subjective side, downright folly or plain immorality. '5

These quotations show clearly enough that the strengthening of Hegel's historical consciousness was accompanied by the need to provide an historical and philosophical apologia for religion, and not just in the sense that he was able to recognize the religions ofthe past as real factors in history the social causes of whose rise and fall were worthy of study, but in the sense of wishing to justify the permanent and hence contemporary relevance of religion. Knowing as we do the course of Hegel's development in Frankfurt this does not come as any surprise to us. We must, Hegel says,

'at least presume that man has a natural sense or consciousness of a supersensible world and an obligation to the divine . . . that everything high, noble and good in man is divine, that it comes from God and is His spirit, issuing from Himself. '6

This is essentially the application to history of the philosophy of religion contained in the Fragment of a System. But it would be one-sided to regard this as the sole aim ofHegel's thought at this time. We do indeed witness that tendency to idealize religion which never disappears, even

after he has long since overcome the mystical excesses of the Frankfurt period. But it would be an error to see only this and to overlook his serious attempts to understand Christianity historically, to see it as that spiritual force that for two thousand years has determined European culture for good and evil, in a progressive or reactionary sense. Hegel opens the essay with a broad survey of the political, social and cultural influence of Christianity in which, characteristically, many of the strictures dating from the Berne period were taken over almost word for word. Since this is Hegel's first historical survey of this kind we think it is important to reprint the passage in its entirety despite its length.

'The Christian religion has sometimes been reproved, sometimes praised, for its consistency with the most varied manners, characters and institutions. It was cradled in the corruption ofthe Roman state; it became dominant when that empire was in the throes of its decline, and we cannot see how Christianity could have stayed its downfall. On the contrary, Rome's fall extended the scope of Christianity's domain, and it appears in the same epoch as the religion of the barbarians, who were totally ignorant and savage but completely free, and also of the Greeks and Romans, who by this time were overcivilized, servile, and plunged in a cesspool of vice. It was the religion of the Italian states in the finest period of their licentious freedom in the Middle Ages; ofthe grave and free Swiss republics; of the more or less moderate monarchies of modern Europe; alike of the most heavily oppressed serfs and their overlords: both attended one church. Headed by the Cross, the Spaniards murdered whole generations in America; over the conquest of India the English sang Christian thanksgivings. Christianity was the mother of the finest blossoms of the plastic arts; it gave rise to the tall edifice of the sciences. Yet in its honour too all fine art was banned, and the development of the sciences was reckoned an impiety. In all climates the tree of the Cross has grown, taken root, and fructified. Every joy in life has been linked with this faith, while the most miserable gloom has found in it its nourishment and its justification. '7

This general account is indeed rather more of a question than an answer and at this point Hegel is far from being able to provide a solution to a problem of such complexity. But the very breadth of his approach here sho,ws a noteworthy advance in historical concreteness since his first efforts in Berne. At the same time, we can see how his improved understanding ofthe tortuous course ofhistorical development is a function of his rejection of Enlightenment methodology with its startingpoint in a general concept of 'man'. It is precisely this sort of historical insight that favours the formation of concrete concepts. In the passage directly following this one Hegel supplements his definition of 'ideal' with this remark:

'But the living nature of man is always other than the concept of the same, and hence what for the concept is a bare modification, a pure accident, a superfluity, becomes a necessity, something living, perhaps the only thing which is natural and beautiful. 'I!

It is evident that such an approach must lead to a much more historical view of the concept of positivity. Hegel no longer inquires: what is positivity? What excites his interest now is the question: how does a religion become 'positive'? Despite this historicism, however, which we were able to see in embryonic form in all his writings from the political pamphlets onward, it would be a mistake to follow the bourgeois historians here and make a sharp distinction between Hegel the 'historicist' and the 'unhistorical' Hegel influenced by the Enlightenment. Even though the majority of Hegel's concepts in Berne may have been metaphysical and unhistorical, his aim was to acquire an overall picture of the course of history. And even though the assumptions he shared with the Enlightenment undoubtedly were an obstacle to the development of a conceptual system capable of doing justice to the complexity of history, the broad sweep of his first exercises in historiography owed much to the beneficial influence of Enlightenment historians. The apologists of reaction can only reach their conclusions by denying that the entire period of the Enlightenment from Gibbon to Condorcet was an age which gave birth to great historical works oflasting importance.

On the other hand, we should not lose sight of the idealist limitations of Hegel's present view of history. The reactionary historians overemphasize and overvalue certain carefully selected aspects of the Hegelian view of history, with which they sympathize because their own view of the development of the historical consciousness is that it stems from the reaction against the French Revolution (i.e. from Burke) and then proceeds via Hegel to Ranke and later apologists. If we wish to understand both the strengths and weaknesses ofHegel's developing system we must see through this sham tradition. The real line of the tradition begins indeed with the ideological debates surrounding the French Revolution but their main tendency is just as powerful a defence of human progress as was found in the Enlightenment but from a much more profound awareness of the facts, the tendencies and the underlying laws ofhistory. It is only ifthis isunderstood that it becomes possible to site Hegel within the histoncal tradition.

It then becomes apparent that Hegel's 'recognition' ofthe facts, in this case the facts ofreligion, represents a definite ideological weakness in his view of history, one arising from his philosophical idealism. The assumption that religion is 'eternal', that it corresponds to an 'ideal of mankind' is not a whit less metaphysical than the concept of a general human nature which he criticizes so incisively. If an authentic historicism is emerging in Hegel's mind, then it must spring from quite different sources than the ones singled out for praise by his reactionary apologists. He constructed an important approach to history despite and not because of what they have found to praise.

Let us now turn to the effect of his new attitude on his definition of positivity. We have already seen the various stages that preceded his present position. Cf. the pamphlet on Württemberg (p. Ipf.), the article on "/ 'he German Constitution (p. i 39ff.), and his treatment of certain passages in The Spirit of Christianity (p. 2oof.). Now he has a much more forthnght and decisive formula for the same phenomenon:

'To shudder before an unknown Being; to renounce one's will in one's conduct; to subject one's selfthroughout like a machine to given rules; to abandon intellect altogether in action or renunciation, in speech or silence; and to lull one's self into a briefor lifelong insensibility—all this may be "natural", and a religion which breathes this spirit would not on that account be positive, because it would accord with the nature of its time. A nature demanded by such a religion would doubtless be a deplorable one; but the religion would have fulfilled its purpose by giving this nature the only higher Being in which it found satisfaction and with which it was compatible.'

And consistently with the observations already discussed Hegel now supplies an answer to the new question:

'Of course religion has become positive at this stage, but it has only become so; it was not so originally.'

When does a religion become positive? We have seen that a religion suited to 'a deplorable nature' was not positive.

'Only when another more courageous mood awakens, when this nature begins to have a sense of itself and thereby to demand freedom in and for itself . . . then and only then can its former religion begin to appear a positive one. '9

Thus the fact that a religion appears positive is the sign of an approaching revolution. Hegel has strongly historicized the concept of positivity here and thus finds himself at the opposite end of the spectrum to the Romantics, who regarded the mere existence of an institution, its very positivity, as an excuse to defend and canonize it (like the later historical school of law) .10 Hegel, by contrast, regards positivity as a sign that history has superseded a religion, that it deserves to be destroyed by history and that it must be so destroyed.

The comparison with Romanticism throws light on another issue of methodological importance. Hegel refuses to decide whether particular Christian dogmas or institutions are positive or not. He demands that analysis should concern the whole:

'but the content of this inquiry will nevertheless always concern the whole rather than the parts. '11

On this question Hegel makes only a few general remarks here, but they are enough to give us pause. Firstly, because we see here the first announcement of what will become a conscious method of philosophical totalization in the Phenomenology with the statement: 'The true is the whole'. Secondly, because the reactionary philosophy of our own day claims a monopoly of philosophical totalization. It does so by converting the whole into a metaphysical concept which is emptied of every real observation ofhistory, i.e. ofevery development which creates a succession of totalities, while at the same time it is consciously opposed to any kind of causal analysis. (Othmar Spann is a characteristic exponent of this view.)

Since there has been no lack of attempts to assimilate Hegel to reactionary postures of this sort it may not be out of place to Cite a passage written a few years later in which Hegel applies his view of totality to a concrete example which helps to clarify the concept of positivity. In the Scientific Modes of Treatment of Natural Law written in Jena 1803," Hegel has occasion to discuss the problem of feudalism and its survival in Germany and in this context he raises the question ofits positivity.

'The feudal constitution, for example, can indeed appear utterly positive ...but whether it does in fact confront life in a positive manner depends on whether the people has organized itself into a true individuality, whether it entirely fills the system and penetrates it with life. . . . Whereas if, for instance, the genius of a nation is generally on a lower plane and of a feebler kind—and the feebleness of ethical life is at its most extreme in a barbaric or a formal society if it allows itself to be conquered by another and is forced to surrender its autonomy, i.e. if it has preferred the misfortune and degradation of losing its independence to struggle and death, . . . then it may very well be the case that feudalism and servitude are absolute truth and that this system is the only possible form of ethical life and for that reason it is necessary, just and ethical.'"

It is evident that the bitterness Hegel feels about the primitive social and national conditions of Germany leads him here to regard the remnants of feudalism as suited to the 'deplorable nature' of the Germans and as nonpositive for that reason. Had there been any real movement in Germany to change the situation feudalism in Hegel's present view would surely have to be thought 'positive'.

The shift towards greater historical concreteness has a further by no means unimportant implication. We recall that in Berne certain attitudes, religions and institutions were marked from the outset with the stain of positivity, whereas others were metaphysically and absolutely free of such stains. Hegel now throws this assumption overboard.

'Any doctrine, any precept, is capable ofbecoming positive . . . and there is no doctrine which might not be true in certain circumstances, no precept which might not impose a duty in certain circumstances, since what may hold good universally as truth unalloyed requires some qualification, because of its universality, in the particular circumstances of its application; i.e. it is not unconditionally true in all circumstances.，14

This brings Hegel very close indeed to the conception of the historical dialectics of the true and the false, contained m the Phenomenology and in his later system.

Needless to say, this insight has two sides, like all of Hegel's discoveries about the dialectical method. And the idealist, non-progressive side of the present argument is that it once again involves the unconditional acceptance of the Christian religion and the adulteration of the historical polemic against it. The remark with which Hegel opens the passage just quoted may seem innocent enough at first sight:

'The question of whether a religion is positive affects the content of its doctrines and precepts far less than the form in which it authenticates the truth ofits doctrines and requires the fulfilment ofits precepts.，15

This sentence does indeed contain a core of truth since Hegel distinguishes between a doctrine which freely and through its own force takes possession of the mmds and hearts of men, and one which can only perpetuate itself with the aid of violence and reprisals, etc. But if we read this sentence together with one quoted earlier (c£ p. 227) which maintained that the religious relation to God was something eternal and that all that is good and noble in man stems from God, then we may fairly see it as an instance of the reactionary idealist attempt to distinguish between the particular histoncal manifestations of religion, which may lapse into positivity and be subjected to criticism, and the 'essence of religion' which is to be enshrined in a realm beyond history.

This duality, even ambivalence, in Hegel's attitude to Christianity appears again and again m varying guises. The quotations just referred to may well give the impression that Hegels essay will end up in a glorification of Christianity. But they are at once followed by a vigorous attack on the fundamental dogma of Chnstianity, on Chnst's mission as redeemer, on his role of mediator between God and man.

'But this view becomes glaringly positive if human nature is absolutely severed from the divine, if no mediation between the two is conceded except in one isolated individual, if all man's consciousness of the good and the divine is degraded to the dull and killing belief in a superior Being altogether alien to man."

Nor is there any possibility of ironing out apparent ambivalences by claiming that Hegel's views accord with one or other Christian sect, as is sometimes maintained. For we have seen that it is precisely the element of sectarianism that Hegel finds so reprehensible in Christianity and he is generally much more hostile to the various sects than he is towards the church itself.

Hegel's idealism in short is irreducibly ambivalent. His understanding of history and society often forces him to go beyond Chnstian points of view. His insight into dialectical interconnections increasingly bnngs

him closer to a position from which the God of Christianity is entirely superfluous. It is very revealing that almost immediately after the last passage quoted he goes on to say that the problem of the positivity of Chnsuamty, of mediation between man and God, could only be


resolved by first solving the problem of the relation between the finite and the infinite. Obviously it was not possible for Hegel to undertake a task of that sort in the framework of an introductory essay and we cannot know with any certainty what views he had put forward on this matter in The Fragment of a System. But we do know that as early asJena he does set out in search of a dialectical solution to the problem, in the course of which he divests the infimte of every trace of transcendence and otherworldliness. This dialectical approach to the infinite——very like parallel ideas in Goethe— as a pronounced tendency to dismantle the philosophical bases for every religious belief in God. But at the same time, we see that because of its own idealism, religious ideas that have apparently been superseded always make their re-appearance in philosophy m a different shape. As we have indicated, the irrepressible duality and ambivalence of Hegelian philosophy is a necessary consequence of his idealism, and this in turn arises from the particular circumstances of the development of bourgeois society m Germany. Even Goethe who, as we know, was much closer to materialism and much more hostile to Christianity

than Hegel, could not free himselfentirely from such religious ideas.


Of course, Hegel's own attitudes towards religion were subject to major changes m the course of his development. In Frankfurt the period of mental crisis represents a high point in his religious beliefs. But the roots of his ambivalent attitude towards Christianity are deep and their influence extends into Jena where his beliefs are even more clearly that society both strengthen his general idealism and lend a special force to his religious views. They enable him to accept the contradictions in Christianity, to combine what is in places very incisive criticism with a generally religiOus orientation, because he is able to imagine the new, contradiction-free society in the form of a new post-Christian religion. (We shall have more to say about the latter when we come to the Jena period Itself.)

defined than here. In particular his illusions about the possibility of overcoming the contradictions of bourgems society within the framework of D                             D           /


Only after the collapse of the Napoleonic empire and with that, the disappearance of his illusions about Napoleon, will Hegel find himself compelled to come to terms with the capitalist world, or as he terms it the 'world of prose'. When that happens Christianity finally becomes a specifically historical form of religion and the ambivalence in Hegel's position reaches its peak. At the same time, his very late writings contain the most complete and most dialectic view of bourgeois society of which he was capable. If we may anticipate our later discussion by callmg attention to one very significant point, it is characteristic of Hegel that his philosophical justification of the 'Estates' (i.e. of the class structure of civil society) becomes progressively less ideological, and much closer to a grasp of society's matenal foundations.

We may therefore venture the paradoxical statement, which, however, really does sum up the contradictory course of Hegel's development, that the more he is driven to abandon the revolutiOnary ideals of his youth, the more resolutely he 'reconciles' himself to the rule ofbour-geois society and the less his thought reaches out to new possi-bilities——then the more powerfully and consciously the dialectician in him awakens. Given the existing histoncal conditions, the dialectical view ofhuman progress which is given its f mt comprehensive and philosophically significant shape in The Phenomenology of Mind could only have been constructed from such a contradictory position. We have seen the birth and growth of these contradictions in Frankfurt. In Jena we shall encounter them agam in a more distinct and more highly developed form. That will be the moment to examine them fully.

It cannot be doubted, however, that the foundations for the later ideas

were laid during the crisis in his mental life m Frankfurt. From a literary point of view Frankfurt, like Berne, produced a heap of fragments and sketches. But whereas a reconstruction of the Berne writings yields an ambitious and coherent design, the result of the Frankfurt years is a chaos of conflicting tendencies. But——and this has been our task in Part 11——it is from amidst this chaos of unresolved contradictions that the Hegelian


dialectic was born. The creative product of the Frankfurt years is the intellectual framework necessary for gaming a philosophical purchase on

reality.


In later years Hegel apparently attached


as little importance to the


Frankfurt writings as to those from Berne. At any rate his stay m Jena is notable for his extraordinarily prolific productivity which is entirely unconnected with any of the projects he was concerned with in FrankfUrt——with the single exception of an attempt to complete the essay on The German Constitution. Hegel went toJena at the age of thirty, without a public reputation of any kind, and without a smgle manuscript which he could or would have seriously intended to publish. Despite this it is apparent that he went to Jena justifiably confident that he was the equal of his school friend Schelling, the most important philosopher of the age.

In the year r8oo Hegel's father died. The very modest estate bequeathed to Hegel enabled him to give up his post as a private tutor and devote himselffor a few years entirely to his studies without material cares or other obligations. He fixed upon Jena as a suitable place for this and wrote to Schelling announcing his decision m a letter which broke the silence into which their correspondence had apparently lapsed. The most important parts of this letter show how Hegel, although he was completely unknown, could approach a friend who had become a celebrity, with the utmost self-assurance. On 2 November 1800 he wrote as follows:

'I have watched-your great public progress with admiration and joy. You will overlook it ifl do not speak about it or do not present myself to you with any false humility. I prefer a middle course and hope that we shall meet again as friends. —In my education which began with the inferior needs of man I was driven. towards science, and my youthful ideals had to be transformed mto reflection and at the same time into a system. While still engaged on this I find myself wondering how to find my way back to the point where I might involve myself once more in the lives of men.——Of all the people I see around me you are the only one whom I should like to have for a friend, even in respect of appearing before the public and producing an effect on the world. For I can see that you have striven purely, i.e. wholeheartedly and without vanity to understand man. It is for this reason that I approach you with such confidence on my own behalf, for I am sure that you will recognize my disinterested efforts and discover some value in them, even if they have taken place in a lesser sphere. In the desire and the hope to meet you I must yet respect fate and hope that it will preside with favour over our reunion.，17

It is the mood of the epigram that we mentioned in our introductory pages as providing a fitting conclusion to his stay in Frankfurt:

'Then you will be not betterthan the age, but the age at its best.'

NOTES

Nohl, p. 142. Knox, p. 170.

Nohl, p. 139. Knox, p. 167.

Nohl, p. 141. Knox, pp. 169-70.

Nohl, p. 144. Knox, p. 173.

Nohl, p. 143. Knox, p. 172.

Noh!, p. 146. Knox, pp. i75-<l.

Noh!, p. 140. Knox, pp. 168--9.

Nohl, p. 141. Knox, p. 169.

Noh!, p. 141. Knox, pp. 169-70.

The historical school oflaw opposed natural law, arguing that law was a product of the historical process and hence varied in accordance with the culture of diferent peoples. Its founder was Friedrich Karl von Savigny (1779-1861).—Trans.

Nohl, p. 144. Knox, p. 173.

Referred to later in this text as the essay on Natural Law—Trans.

Lasson, p. 405f.

Nohl, p. 143. Knox, pp. 171—2.

Nohl, p. 143. Knox, p. 171.

Nohl, p. 146. Knox, p. 176.

Rosenkranz, p. I43£
